The AES Corporation (NYSE:
May 09, 2013  8:00 am ET
Executives
Ahmed Pasha - Vice President of Investor Relations
Andres Ricardo Gluski Weilert - Chief Executive Officer, President, Director and Chairman of Strategy & Investment Committee
Andrew Martin Vesley - Chief Operating Officer and Executive Vice President
Kenneth J. Zagzebski - Chief Executive Officer, President and Director
Felipe Ceron
Britaldo Pedrosa Soares - Vice President and Group Manager of Aes Brazil
Annmarie Reynolds
Thomas M. O\'Flynn - Chief Financial Officer and Executive Vice President
Analysts
Ali Agha - SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc., Research Division
Julien Dumoulin-Smith - UBS Investment Bank, Research Division
Ahmed Pasha
Good morning, everyone. I\'m Ahmed Pasha, Vice President of Investor Relations of AES. We know it\'s a very busy time for all of you, so we appreciate you taking your time to join us this morning, both here in New York, as well as on the webcast.
Before we start today\'s presentation, I would like to draw your attention to Slide 2 of today\'s presentation. Our discussion today will include forward-looking statements. Please refer to our SEC filings for disclosures around the risk factors that may cause our actual results to differ materially from these forward-looking statements.
Today, we have a lot to talk about. You will hear from 7 members of our senior management team. We have provided bios for our executive leadership team, as well as for those who are presenting.
In terms of the presentation, we designed the presentation to give you some more insight into the key drivers and opportunities that we see across our significant businesses. We have also provided additional financial disclosures that we hope will give you some additional insight as to how we\'re going to achieve our target growth rates.
Today\'s presentation consists of 2 parts: First, you will hear from Andr\xc3\xa9s Gluski, our Chief Executive Officer. Please hold questions for Andr\xc3\xa9s until the end of the presentation. After Andr\xc3\xa9s, you will hear from the panel on our SBUs. This will be led by our COO, Andy Vesey. You will also hear from Ken Zagzebski, President of our U.S. SBU; Felipe Ceron, who leads our business in Chile, Colombia and Argentina; and Britaldo Soares, who is the head of our Brazil operation.
We will have a Q&A session after the panel presentation, and we\'re going to have a 20 minute break at about 10:20.
After that, you will hear from Annmarie Reynolds, who is our Chief Risk Officer; and Tom O\'Flynn, who is our CFO. After Andr\xc3\xa9s wrap up the session, we\'re going to have a Q&A, where our entire management team will be available to answer any questions you may have.
After the presentation and Q&A, we\'re going to have an informal lunch, so please join us. And our management team will be available to answer any remaining questions you may have.
With that, let me turn it over to Andr\xc3\xa9s.
Andres Ricardo Gluski Weilert
Good morning, everyone, and everyone who\'s on the webcast. Also, thank you very much for joining us. What I\'d like to do today, in terms of our presentation, is first share the first quarter financial results. These have been out for some time. We had our press release this morning. Then discuss our progress on executing our strategy. Describe our future growth and value drivers. And Tom and the SBU presidents will be providing a lot more transparency and a lot more disclosure. And you\'ll also get the opportunity to meet our leaders from the field, who are leading these key businesses. Then Annmarie Reynolds, our Chief Risk Officer, is going to talk about our risk management approach, our exposure and our mitigants. And then we\'re going to talk about our debt reduction level, dividend policy and answer any questions.
So starting with the first quarter, our adjusted EPS for the quarter was $0.26. This was $0.11 less than the first quarter of last year. Now this decline is mostly due to 2 things: One is that we had a $0.06 upside in the first quarter of 2012, due to the settlement of the arbitration at our Cartagena plant in Spain; and the second is low hydrology that we\'ve been experiencing in Latin America, especially in Brazil and in Panama. And that\'s had a sense of -- a hit of around $0.03 during the first quarter. Now this is -- that hydrology situation is something we expect to persist throughout the year, but we are taking steps to mitigate this. Now we did have a significant increase in both proportional and consolidated cash flow metrics for the quarter. We were up on proportional $117 million versus the same quarter of last year, which is 50%. And on consolidated $84 million, which is up 16%. So we feel that this is a solid quarter. We are reaffirming our guidance for the year of adjusted EPS in the $1.24 to $1.32, and we\'re also confirming our cash flow metrics.
Now for most of you, you\'re well aware of what AES is, but I wanted to take a minute and just go through AES. So one of the metrics that we\'ll be talking a lot about today is our pretax contribution. So this the money that we make in the businesses. It was $2.1 billion in 2012 before -- and this is before corporate charges of around $700 million. So we divide our business into 2 big blocks. The first is generation, which is a majority contracted. The biggest businesses are the U.S., Chile, Brazil, Philippines and Central America, and we have about 30 gigawatts of generating capacity. The other big block of business that we have is U.S. utilities, which is regulated, U.S. and Brazil utilities, which is regulated, and this includes 8 gigawatts of generating capacity.
Now how we think about our business? We think about our business in terms of market-facing strategic business units, which have a geographical base. So except for solar, we really don\'t have any businesses which are specific to one technology or one fuel type. So right now, our global distribution is about 37% coal, 33% gas, 24% renewable and the rest a combination of oil, diesel and petcoke.
In terms of our strategic business units, and these were designed again around -- to be market-facing and places where we had commonalities that we could bring people together to operate in the most efficient manner. There\'s 6 of them: So U.S.; what we call Andes, which is primarily Chile and Colombia and Argentina; Brazil; the other one is Mexico, Central America and the Caribbean and including Puerto Rico; then we have Europe, Middle East and Africa; and then Asia is 10%. So if you look at this, we\'re 70% a company of the Americas. This is our core in terms of where our business is located, and about 29% of the rest of the world.
Now one of the things -- we\'re 18 months into starting to execute on a new strategy. And we had laid out sort of 3 drivers for driving shareholder value. So the first was improving profitability, and I\'ll talk a little bit about the progress we\'ve made in reducing overhead, and some of the progress we\'ve made in terms of increasing the usage of our invested capital.
The second is narrowing our geographic focus. AES is a portfolio. That\'s one of the advantages we have. We have a fantastic footprint in a number of rapidly growing markets, but we don\'t have to be in as many markets as we were in to have the advantages of a portfolio. So we have been working on simplifying our portfolio by selling assets that were not core, or those assets where we really felt that we did not have a compelling competitive advantage or a way to get a compelling competitive advantage.
And the third is working on optimizing our capital allocation. We have a very strict investment process through an Investment Committee, where we look at projects early on, to have a go or no go, and throughout the whole phase of development until final approval. So we compare investment opportunities not only at one point in time between different businesses, but also across time because we\'re very well aware that if you make an investment early on, that precludes being able to make certain investments later on. So the Investment Committee process we think has been a big help. We\'re also going to talk a little bit about our partnering strategy and other ways that we\'re working to increase our return on invested capital.
Now I\'m going to talk about how we streamlined operations. Now the numbers I have up here are only the reductions of -- in overhead, in corporate overhead, this does not include the cost-saving programs that we have at the business level. So this is strictly AES Corp. So as of end of last year, starting from the base at which we were in 2011, our G&A was down $90 million. And this is net of severance cost in terms of our reductions. And we also established a goal of $145 million in reduction of overhead by 2014. So the big changes we\'re going to make this year. This year, our run rate -- and that was the results we expect for this year are savings of $120 million in overhead over the base of 2011. And by 2014, if we compared 2014 to 2011, that\'s a reduction of almost 40%. Now how are we able to achieve these savings? Well, first of all, we determined a strategy, which we shared with you. And then we said, "What is the optimal organization to achieve that strategy?" So we\'re organizing to achieve that strategy. So we\'re going to be in less countries. And we\'re going to focus on platform expansion. Then we have -- we can spend a lot less in business development. As we have a much higher hit rate and much less expenses. And I would also argue a much higher risk-adjusted returns because we\'re already in those markets. We know the regulators. Most of these plants, you will see, have a 2, 3, even a 5 after them, meaning we\'re expanding. We\'re sharing certain facilities. And these have been very successful. So about $10 million to $20 million of greater savings will come from streamlining -- further streamlining of corporate business development. The reorganization into strategic business units, we eliminated a layer and others as we consolidate. That should be another $20 million to $25 million. That\'s happening as we speak. The third of this would be a relocating to low cost offices in terms of, for example, we handle a lot of the European and African operations out of London. Well, that office is being moved to Amsterdam. In terms of the U.S. generation, it used to be based in Houston, we\'re moving that to Indianapolis. And we used to do a lot of the Asian operations and back-office from Singapore; that\'s being moved to Manila. So that\'s part of the strategic business units. We\'re relocating to lower-cost locations. We\'re also centralizing those support functions, where it makes more sense, you have more synergies to do them at the corp. So in all, we are well on our way to reducing these costs. And as I said, this is strictly corporate overhead. This does not include programs at the business level.
So the other thing that we\'ve done is to really leverage our size and know-how to really take advantage of our global scale, take advantage of synergies. So take fuel sourcing. We buy about $2 billion worth of coal a year. And we are now getting the advantage of that scale. Now it\'s not just aggregation, adding up how much coal we purchase around the world. We also had to look at the logistics. Do we have cheap freight contracts? Do our coal purchase contract allow us to redirect shipments so that if one plant is burning more coal and one is burning less coal, instead of having a high stockpile in one place and a shortage in the other, we can internally redirect this. And of course, to be able to do that, you have to have tried blending in the plant, testing the different fuel types and how much you can blend. So we\'ve done that. And we\'re having significant benefits from that over time.
Regarding nonfuel sourcing, we have global relationships.  What are these? Well, in IT, in terms of making large-scale purchases for all of our businesses, chemicals, we also have a captive insurance, which we think gives us about $20 million of benefits in terms of lower cost per year. Because when you have an asset base of close to $50 billion, you\'re able to get the first tier reinsurers interested and competing for your businesses. So you get the economies of scale, but you also get first-class insurers in locations where you probably wouldn\'t otherwise.
In terms of maintenance and capital expenditures, we\'re looking at aggregating capital purchases, standardizing around certain equipment to reduce our working capital and innovations like our transformer loss control program. We did some data mining, and we really discovered that our biggest business interruption cost was when we lost a transformer, and we\'re unable to evacuate energy from a plant. So we have designed a multipurpose transformer, and we have positioned them in strategic locations around the globe. And we have the logistics to be able to move them to any of our major plant, should an event occur. Now this is a very interesting idea. Nobody\'s done this before. And this is something that could end up being sold, let\'s say, or leased to third parties if they find themselves in the situation. So we are really pushing innovation, using underlying resources, the capital that we had invested, be it desal, small add-ons like fogging technology, spillways to increase our generation capacity at our existing facility. So what we\'re looking at is every possible way that we can make better use of our capital, make better use of our footprint and relationships that we have in key markets. So we also, I think, are being recognized, and Andy will talk more about this, as a very good operator. Two cases that he will talk about. One is Masinloc. When we bought this, this was privatized in 2008. We brought up the equivalent availability factor from 74% to 93%. I think even more impressive is what we did in Mexico, where we, I think, gained a reputation of being a first-class operator of inside-the-fence generation. When we bought 2 plants TEG, TEP. One was Exelon. The other one was Alstom, this was not a privatization. This was from other private companies. We brought up the availability from 75% to 92%. So certain technologies like coal fluidized bed, we really feel that we are a world leader.
Now in terms of leveraging our size, our platform and growth. Over the past 5 years, we brought online around 4,241 megawatts. And we currently have under construction 2,443 more megawatts. Now if you look at what fuel types have we brought online or will bring online, 60% of this is coal, 21% is gas, 12% is renewable and 7% is oil and diesel. But what I think is very important, when you look at the plants that we\'re building now, 2 things stand out. One is the number of partnerships that we have. So why are we bringing in partners? One reason is because, in most cases, we get a promote. Since we had the footprint, we had the relationships, we had the site. We bring in the partner, and we have a promote. That increases our return on invested capital. The second thing is we\'re choosing partners who can bring beneficial financing, be it through an export credit agency or bilateral. It helps lower the cost of capital on these projects. And the other thing I would say to note is that the number that are just expansions from existing platforms. So for example, in Chile, we commissioned the Angamos plant. Now we\'re going to have Cochrane, which is next door, and is a very similar plant with the same contractor. And we\'re bringing in a partner. That is a very low risk project.
In India, with OPGC, with the same partner, we\'re going to build OPGC II. In Ventanas in Chile, we had Ventanas I and II.  We built III and IV. And perhaps the most extreme case is Guacolda, where we had Guacolda I and II, we\'ve done III, IV and V.  And V is exactly the same technology as IV, with the same EPC contractor. So in addition to, again, using our platform, expanding from the base, we\'re also making these small investments that have higher returns and lower time.
Now what have we done in terms of simplifying our portfolio. One of the things is that AES was again in a number of countries around the world, almost 30 at one point. And we really had to decide what countries should we focus on? Where should we focus our capital, where should we focus our energies on? So we really came from the view that where we don\'t have a compelling competitive advantage or we don\'t have a roadmap to develop one, then we should probably exit. Now we decided to exit over time, not have a fire sale, to not really -- to really maximize the benefits from these sales. And that\'s what we\'ve done. We identified, 18 months ago, a universe of around $2 billion of potential asset sales. And by the end of this year, we should be about 3/4 of the way through. And as I said, we will sell when it makes sense and in the right conditions.
Nonetheless, we are relentless in terms of simplifying our portfolio. If you look at the map, we\'ve exited 6 countries over the last 18 months: China, France, Spain, Hungary, the Czech Republic and the Ukraine. And we sold, we think, at very good prices. And I think that the methodology that we have followed is the right way. We will continue to do this.
Now getting into optimizing our capital allocation, what have we done from the money, the $1.1 billion that we have received plus cash flow we\'ve generated from our operations? We said early on, back in September of 2011, that we wanted to reach strong BB credit metrics. So we prepaid about a $1 billion in terms of debt prepayment, besides sort of the normal maturities coming. About $820 million of this was recourse debt at the parent and $197 million was expensive debt in a Holdco at Brasiliana. And part of the reason for doing it was not only the cost, but to make sure that we had less obstruction to getting dividends from Brazil up to corp.
We also did a share buyback. We bought back 34 million shares at $11 -- an average price of $11.55 for $300 million -- $390 million. And we started our first quarterly dividend, and we\'ve made 2 payments to date.
Now what I\'d like to expand upon today is on a dividend policy, now that we\'ve established that we\'re paying a dividend. So we will be targeting a payout ratio of 30% to 40% of sustainable parent free cash flow. And Tom will walk you through how we derive parent free cash flow from our proportional free cash flow. But basically, this currently is at a level, as you can see from below, what percentage was our dividend in 2012 and in 2013, and what was our parent free cash flow in those years. So it\'s been between -- it\'s been below, if you average it, around 25%. So what we plan, over time, is to move into this 30% to 40% ratio. And a sustainable means that if 1 year, for example, we had a blip up or down, that we\'re not going to change our dividend as a result. So we will review this in the fourth quarter of every year to see -- do we feel that our sustainable free cash flow has more projects come online as we have the benefit of the cost cutting, of the simplified portfolio, should we raise the dividend at that time? So this is our dividend policy going forward. We understand it is somewhat of a wide range. But Tom will give you more specifics on this.
So getting back to AES, we have a footprint in rapidly growing markets. We have an important footprint in the U.S. But if you look at the next couple of years, forecasted energy demand growth in the U.S. markets where we\'re in is around 1%. So these numbers that you see for growth rates over the next couple of years is weighted by our proportional EBITDA in these countries. So it\'s not like all of Brazil or, say, all of Europe, Middle East and Africa. It\'s weighted by those countries that we\'re in. So what you\'ll see is, for example, the Andes region between Chile and Colombia, you have very robust energy demand growth. And this is something that -- this is a trend that will continue given the project. Brazil, we expect that to reach around 4%. Mexico, Central America and the Caribbean is also around 4%. Those countries that we\'re in in the EMEA is around 5%. And the Asian countries that we\'re in is also 5%. So I think what distinguishes AES from other companies in the S&P Utilities Index is really that we\'re in much more rapidly growing markets, and they are in markets the are much more short energy.
Of course, in the U.S., as Ken will talk about, we are also doing what they\'re doing in terms of building -- possibly building a new combined cycle to take advantage of the cheaper gas, as we have to retire some of the older coal plants. Also rate basing some of the environmental investments. But AES, again, we will have a smaller footprint, where we\'re going to stay in the top-quality countries where we have a competitive advantage.
Now thinking about some of our short-term projects, shorter-term projects, \'12 and \'13, we have almost 800 megawatts under construction. So this adds to total cost of around $1.4 billion. AES has already paid in full its $280 million of equity for these projects. Now of course, we will have growth CapEx. We will be investing in other growth projects besides these, but they will have a determination date past 2015. But when these specific projects come online, we expect return on equity of 14% and just by 0.5%, the cash yield is also 14%. So again, we continue to commission these projects to execute on our platform expansions.
In terms of our risk-adjusted returns. So we had given guidance of a total return of 6% to 8% from 2012 through 2015. In 2012, we had a 22% increase in our adjusted earnings per share. And we expect a range of 4% to 6% from \'13 through \'15. And how are we going to achieve this? As you see, Tom will give you again more details, but it has to do with our increased efficiency. It has to do with the returns from those investments that we\'ve made.
So in summing up, I feel that we\'re executing on the strategy that we\'ve laid out. We are clear where we want to go. And we are very focused on having the whole organization with the right incentives, with the right structure to achieve these successfully.
So first, as we mentioned, is improving our profitability. So it\'s not only an issue of cutting cost in the corp. It\'s also cutting cost in the businesses, taking advantage of our scale and also being innovative and using our footprint and to have adjacent small businesses that are related to our core businesses.
The second is narrowing our geographic focus. Selling out those businesses where -- which drive a lot of overhead, quite frankly, because they\'re small one-off in terms of sales. Going to those locations where we\'re strong gets being, let\'s say, very rigorous in terms of persisting in our sales process, making sure we get good value for the money.
And in terms of optimizing our capital allocation, having great discipline in terms of where we allocate those dollars, making not only intercompany comparisons but intertemporal comparisons, making sure that anything we do is derived from the strategy, just as we do with the organization. And we\'re very clear in terms of returning money to our shareholders. So that is the overview. Again, today we\'ll be providing a lot more information and hope to give a lot more transparency in answering your questions. But the whole organization this, I think, is a very coherent picture in terms of what we\'re doing. We\'re doing exactly what we laid out 18 months ago and executing on it.
So now I\'d like to present Andy Vesey, our Chief Operating Officer, who will talk about our new strategic business units.
Andrew Martin Vesley
Okay, good morning, and welcome to those who are with us here and those on the webcast. I\'m Andy Vesey. I\'m Chief Operating Officer.
We\'re going to spend about the next 1.5 hour or so really sort of deep diving into some of the operations in SBUs. And we have a great opportunity because we have 3 of the SBU presidents here from some of the -- 3 of the most significant business units, so we\'ll have that opportunity. But before we do that, I just want to give you some sense of my view of these businesses.
Some of this Andr\xc3\xa9s has already mentioned. But what drives our business, for the most part, across all the SBUs is operational excellence. And for that, that\'s not a throwaway phrase. We\'re serious. It\'s something we work on every day. And the first thing on the slide talks about safety. It\'s very important to us. So we work in a very hazardous business. It\'s construction. It\'s operation on live wires, and it\'s the operation of generating plants. And this is a 24-hour a day operation. And when the phone rings, my phone rings in the middle of the night, I know it\'s not good news. But safety is important to us because it is the primary benchmark of quality operations. Everything you need to do to do safety right allows you to operate your businesses well. It takes teamwork, communication, expectation setting, accountability at all levels. So when you look at an operating business, the first hallmark of a quality operation is safety.
I would also tell you that there\'s a financial impact to bad safety in training, in retention, in cost and in insurance. I start every talk I make with safety, and I\'m not going to let this opportunity go by.
For your information, should there be a need to exit this room in an emergency, whether there is an alarm or a hotel personnel tell you to go, directly behind you, exiting straight -- there are 2 exit doors. Now however, there are tables in front of them.  Please continue to move through the tables out that door. You can also exit out this way into the main lobby and then either to Central Park South or to 58th Street. Hopefully, that\'s not the case. But probably more important is please, the #1 hazard you\'ll face here is tripping. People have bags in the aisles, there are wires that are taped down. So please be attentive. As Andr\xc3\xa9s told me very clearly, that if we had suffered any accidents, lost time incidents in this room, he would personally make sure my compensation reflected that. And I have enough at stake already, I don\'t need that burden.
So after we talk about that, I\'ll just talk about sort of practices and processes. We pride ourselves in having a process-oriented business. We have major processes that all our businesses operate by. That\'s a discipline. It gives our businesses the ability to operate within boundaries and operate with great empowerment, but within boundaries. We have something called revenue management, which looks at our distribution\'s ability to actually bring in the revenue they bill. We have work management, which talks about the productivity of labor in all our operations. And we have asset management, which for us means making sure that as we allocate both operating and maintenance expense and capital expense, it\'s done in a way that has its biggest positive benefit for the business and connection with our strategy.
We\'re very proud that our Tiet\xc3\xaa business in Brazil, which is the 2,600 megawatts of hydro generation on the Tiet\xc3\xaa River is not only the first, but the only Latin American business to achieve a PAS 55 standard certification in asset management. This is issued by the British Standards Institute. It\'s the highest benchmark. And it soon will become the ISO 55000 standard. It\'s our first company to achieve it. It will not be the last company to achieve it. And Britaldo will talk more about this when he comes up.
Andr\xc3\xa9s just talked a lot about scale, so I won\'t add anything to that because he said all the key points. I will say that the one thing we didn\'t mention is that we have global IT platforms. Efficient operations, efficient financial performance depends on having timely, quality data. You can\'t have quality, timely data that would then become the information for management without platforms and IT. And common platforms allow us to do that well. So Elizabeth Hackenson, please raise your hand, is CIO. It\'s her responsibility. She\'s been doing an excellent job because we\'re very good at moving data from the bottom of the organization to the top and taking actions on it.
The last item on the list that you see here is something that we also think is critically, critically important. And quite honestly, if you don\'t believe we\'re very good at this, this may not be the company for you.  It\'s stakeholder engagement.
Large infrastructure projects in all markets require a sense of equity to be provided to all participants, whether those are the governments, state or local, or federal level, communities around your plants, labor, customers, investors. Everybody has this feel that they\'re getting the proper portion of the value of a project. We spend a lot of time doing this. Andr\xc3\xa9s talked about, he\'s mentioned Ventanas IV. Some of you might remember that we used to call that plant Campiche. Andr\xc3\xa9s and I had the pleasure of attending the inauguration of that plant 2 weeks ago in Santiago. And what\'s very interesting is that many of you may remember that in the middle of that construction project where we had over $100 million of equity in a hole on that site, the environmental permits were pulled because a suit was brought against the Chilean authority that gave us the permits. We recovered those permits. And we recovered those permits specifically through active stakeholder engagement in the local community as well in Santiago, as well as in Washington.
I would say we\'re arguably the only people to ever do that. So we don\'t underestimate the value of active and high quality stakeholder engagement. It permeates everything we do. We can only do it if we are recognized as very strong operators. So let\'s tell you what we\'re very proud of. You see a bust of Edison. If you didn\'t recognize him, that is Thomas Edison in bronze on that slide. Every year, the Edison Electric Institute awards the Edison, which is to look at people who\'ve advanced the industry, provided industry leadership. There is both a domestic award and an international award. We are the only company to have won 3 awards in 6 years. And again this year, we\'re a finalist. I won\'t talk more about being a finalist yet because I can\'t trump EEI, but that will come out in June. But what we like is we\'ve been recognized in different aspects of our business are critically important. The first in 2007, which was for our then Latin American businesses, specifically on the processes I told you about, asset management, revenue management, work management, across both our generation and distribution businesses. In 2010, we were recognized for the turnaround of Masinloc, which was -- we acquired from the Philippine government and turned it around. We\'ll talk a little bit more of that as we get into the SBUs. And lastly in 2012, we won an award for the timely and quality completion of the Angamos plant, not only for the construction, but the innovative use of seawater cooling to minimize the amount of water use in that plant and also the inclusion of advanced batteries to provide additional spinning reserve capability. So across the value chain of what we do in operations, it\'s not only that we think we\'re good, it\'s that we have recognition from others that indeed we\'re achieving our goals. And it\'s something that we continue to work on, and it\'s something that I spend my time on and all my SBU presidents lead as well.
The other thing I\'d just talk about is leveraging the platform. And we think about the platform, one of the most obvious things we lever is our operating capability, which we talked about, but there is more. Fundamentally, every platform we have, it\'s the obligation of our business leaders to try to drive as much value out of those platforms as necessary -- as available, and you can see that in some of the listings. Well, Uruguaiana, which is our combined cycle in Southern Brazil. Britaldo will talk more about it. When Argentinian gas stoped flowing to that project in 2009.  There has been a very severe drought at the end of the last year and continues into this year in Brazil, all thermal capacity has been dispatched. Through active engagement with both the Brazilian and Argentinian government, we\'ve been able to get Petrobras gas through Argentina to that plant and have already had that plant in operations for 2 months this year. Britaldo and his team continue to work with both governments to bring back that plant on a full time basis so that we can receive a payment for the capacity and provide a service to the governments of both Brazil and Argentina to make sure they have available thermal capacity.
Keeping that plant in shape, properly in hibernation, allowed us to bring that back within 2 months with a minimal capital investment. Southland, this is our complex of gas plants in the L.A. basin. Good business. It\'s going to be there for a long time. And what\'s it\'s great value? Location, location, location.
Those plants and those sites will have value for a long time. With the unavailability of the San Onofre nuclear plant last year, we were able to bring back 2 units at Huntington Beach to provide service. And that was something which was upside for us last year. This year, because San Onofre is still unavailable, we have invested in putting in synchronous condensers for voltage support. Continuing to think about how we make value of -- out of these sites and these plants beyond the generation that they provide today, critically important. You see a list of plants underneath that. These are all the platform extensions that Andr\xc3\xa9s mentioned. The only one on this list that I don\'t think he taught, there are 2. One is Tunjita, which is a 20-megawatt hydro that is actually bolted on to our Chivor 1,000-megawatt hydro facility in Colombia. There is an existing water flow tailrace, where we basically are building a small hydro plant. Most of the infrastructure is there. There is a very nice small hydro. It also qualifies for other benefits because it\'s considered a small hydro. Felipe may talk more about that when he presents.
The other one here is Alto Maipo. Alto Maipo is this 532-megawatt run-of-the-river hydro that we\'re building in the Andes, very close to Santiago. But it\'s a platform extension. We already have a hydro there.  It\'s called Alfalfal, which just talks about the brilliantly green alfalfa fields around that plant. Well, what this is is using the current infrastructure and also current water rights we have in the Andes and consolidating them so that we can add more capacity very close to Santiago. It doesn\'t need big transmission and almost all the works are underground. Felipe will talk more about that.
Adjacent business lines, very quickly. Virtual gas distribution, as you know, we operate one of the only re-gas facilities in the Caribbean and in the Dominican Republic. We sell gas for non-power purposes at the fence line, both compressed gas and cryogenic gas, the liquid gas. We have a cryogenic truck loading facility. So there is natural gas. It comes because we provide that and enable that from our own plant. And it actually produces some revenue for us, and we\'ll talk about that when we talk more about that business unit. Oh, and I actually skipped one, which is the InterAndes transmission line, talk about that very quickly.
Gener and Chile operates a combined -- a gas plant in Northern Argentina that for years has exported electricity into the northern grid in Chile. Our export license has expired. We had a 345 kV line that goes over the Andes. It\'s actually one of the highest altitude transmission lines in the world. The highest structure is over 15,000 feet above sea level. The team is now working to be able to bring 250 megawatts from Northern Chile into Argentina and collect a -- and actually a tolling charge on that transmission. Felipe will talk more about that.
Adjacent business lines, we talked about gas, energy storage. We have over 50 megawatts of advanced batteries in Chile, which provides spinning reserve, actually allowing capacity release, meaning we don\'t have a to hold back on our coal plant. We actually can provide that service with batteries and therefore bring more capacity to market. We also have used it for frequency regulation in the States. So battery is a very important part of our -- on our existing platform, so you have additional service. Desalinization.  Many of our plants have to desalinate water for process use. Well, if we need it, chances are other industries around us need desalinized process water as well. So we\'re currently exploring opportunities to provide desalinated process water at the fence line to other process industries. We believe, with current technology, we can produce that less expensively than anybody else. So this might be one of the things we\'ll talking about in additional revenue line.
Lastly, Andr\xc3\xa9s talked about, so I won\'t spend much more time.  We\'ve adopted a transformer loss program for our own use. But now, we actually see interest in the market for other people to join this program and get the same benefits that we have. So SBUs very quickly, Andr\xc3\xa9s talked to you about this, and you can scan these, and you\'ll have this in hard copy in front of you.
But if you go look at our markets, our markets are either highly contracted revenue or regulated revenue in, for the most part, medium or high growth markets with some exceptions, as Andr\xc3\xa9s pointed out. But that\'s not the way we\'ve organized. We\'ve organized around commonality, to have market-facing businesses that can practice good stakeholder management and pay attention to their customers. So they\'re market-facing. We basically also want to make sure that we have the opportunity for consolidation of functional management and also make sure that we do our back-office services in the lowest cost place, as Andr\xc3\xa9s talked today as well.
But the other thing that\'s worthwhile talking about is that we\'ve also designed these structures to be very efficient in terms of being transparent and have very good communications. In our generation businesses, between me and our front-line manager is 5 levels, and our distribution business is, on average, 7. So if you add Andr\xc3\xa9s on top of that, you\'ve got 6 and 8. So we know what\'s happening in our businesses. It\'s very important. Because I said, information is the key to running these businesses well.
So very quickly before we get into the details, let\'s go back.  Let\'s call this the PTC wheel. This is the wheel of PTC adjusted 2012. What we will do is we will start with -- there are 11 key businesses here that represent over 70% of that PTC, and we\'re going to talk about all those key businesses in the next hour.
We\'ll start with our U.S. SBU.  Ken Zagzebski will come up here in a moment. That wasn\'t the invitation yet. That was only the introduction. So Ken will come up and talk to us about the businesses in the U.S. He\'ll be followed by Felipe Ceron, who heads up the Andes business unit, then Britaldo Soares from Brazil. I will come back at that point and try to match their -- the intensity of their presentations with talking to you about the MCAC, EMEA and Asia. And when we conclude that, we will all come up to the stage and be available for Q&A. And I think this just a tremendous opportunity that you will have to actually talk to some of the key business leaders, and we hope you can take advantage of that.
And now Ken, why don\'t you come up?
Kenneth J. Zagzebski
All right. Good morning, everybody. I\'m going to talk about the U.S. strategic business unit. And just so I kind of give you just a setting, I\'m going to take about 20 minutes. I\'m going to have 1 slide that kind of gives you a brief overview. Then I\'m going to talk about the U.S. generation facilities or businesses, and then IPL and then Dayton Power & Light after that.
So just overall, if you take a look at the business, we\'ve got 39 generating facilities. And so we got 13,000 megawatts across the U.S. Estimated about 50% of that is coal, about 40% is gas and about 10% is wind and other.
We also have 2 vertically integrated utilities, so IPL and DPL. We have about 1 million customers with the 2 of those businesses. If you look at the U.S. generation group, again, about 21 businesses and located in 3 general areas. So if you\'d take a look at the map, in the southern part of the U.S. in Oklahoma and Texas, we got petcoke. We got wind and we have coal in that region. If you go up to the northeast, you got the -- in the PJM area, we\'ve got coal, and we got wind in that area. And then if you go to the western part of the U.S., we got gas, as Andy alluded to in Southern California, we also have wind and then we have coal in Hawaii.
Indiana -- Indianapolis Power & Light, headquartered in Indianapolis. And we serve the customers in that city and also the surrounding communities. 470,000 customers, and that is traditional regulation. So if you think of just a traditional regulation in terms of vertically integrated utility, IPL fits that description. And also Dayton Power & Light, so located a couple of hours to the east of Indianapolis. We serve West Central Ohio and about 24 counties in that area. A little over 0.5 million distribution customers there. And that regulation is different, obviously. So the T&D is similar to that of IPL, but the generation is moving more to a competitive type market. I think the other thing I\'d just like to note is that the proximity of the 2 utilities allow us to share resources in terms of either storms or other times that we need to -- need additional resources to help restore power. The proximity of the 2 locations allow that to happen quite easily.
First I\'ll talk about the U.S. generation business. And I think if I leave you with one thought of the U.S. generation business, it\'s a low-risk portfolio of businesses. So we have 21 businesses in this group. And it\'s a low-risk business. So we have PPAs. We got contracts with all those or I should say, 94% of the megawatts of that in the -- they all last 5 or more years. We don\'t any material contracts falling off for over 5 years. The average is 6.5 years. Well, also in terms of lower risk, we also have a fuel pass-through for the thermal facilities. So we pass-through the fuel cost. The one to exception to that is Hawaii. In Hawaii, we have our coal contracted through 2013.  We\'re in the process of procuring 2014 coal now, and at least early indications are that price will come in at or lower than 2013 levels.
If I just kind of walk through the different types of generation, just a few comments on each of those. I\'ll start with the coal. So on the coal, we\'ve had a tremendous performance out of that group. Andy talks about the operational excellence. We\'ve been in the top decile in terms of our availability, so those units have been available. Also Andr\xc3\xa9s talked about utilizing the footprint. So today we\'re utilizing the footprint. We\'ve added equipment to each of our coal facilities to enhance fuel flexibility, and so that allows us to either burn higher sulfur coal, which is cheaper, or to leverage different mines to be able to buy coal from different sources.
Next, if I\'ll talk about the wind. Wind is a large part of our portfolio. So we got 20% of our megawatts are on wind. That\'s -- we also have about $700 million invested in that. And what you\'re going to see over the course of the next 5 years is most of our deals are structured with tax equity partnerships. So with that, you\'re going to see the allocation, a majority of the allocation in the earnings are going to shift over to AES over the next 5 years. So we\'ll see significant earnings growth in this part of the business. I think the other point I\'d note on the wind is that we\'re not looking to develop any new wind facility at this time, so we don\'t look at pursuing that.
Lastly, I\'ll talk about the gas component. So gas is -- it\'s in Southern California. So these are also facilities that have operated extremely well. We have met all of our availability targets since we\'ve owned these assets. As Andy alluded to, we\'ve also -- we had the restart of Huntington Beach 3 and 4 last year. We did that on a very short notice. This year it\'s with the synchronous condensers, so taking additional revenue as a result of that. I think Andy talked about location as well. And we do have extreme locational advantage here. So in terms of a couple of things. One is in the transmission into the area. As you can pretty well guess, it\'s difficult to add new transmission in California. Also different is it\'s difficult to cite new generation. So if the transmission come into these sites with the need for local reliability in the area; we\'ve got extreme locational advantage. And so as you look to the future, and it\'s a ways off, but if you look to 316(b), which is environmental regulations to do with water intake, that\'s going to affect California at the end of 2020. We have the -- we\'re looking at options to either repower or utilize those sites in other ways, so we can take advantage of that. We can look at utilizing these sites for a long time going forward.
Indianapolis Power & Light. When you look at the business drivers of this company, I think it comes down fundamentally to the quality of the legislation, the regulation in that state. It\'s a traditional type of utility. And if you look at the regulation there, it\'s been extremely favorable. So if you go back in the past and take a look at what we\'ve done there in terms of fuel clause adjustments, any type of environmental mandates, you could track a recovery for that. You could recover those costs immediately. And then just recently, there\'s been a couple of events. So last week on Tuesday, the governor signed the bill that allowed track recovery on T&D infrastructure investments as well, and also future test years. So just, I point this out because I think it\'s important to note that the quality legislation and regulation in states, we see that continuing going forward. On Wednesday last week, we had a press conference announcing that we were going to pursue building a combined cycle gas plant at our Eagle Valley site, 30 miles south of the city. The governor was present at that press conference with me to indicate that he believes in the energy policy that they have in the state. And that it\'s not only critical for the energy industry itself, but also for economic development for the state. So very supportive both on the legislative side and the regulatory side in the state.
I think the other part of the business drivers is our part of it is that we got to perform extremely well. And so we have to be operationally excellent. And you take a look in the past with IPL, it\'s been recognized by EEI. We\'re in the top 5% in terms of reliability for our customers. In J.D. Power this past year, acknowledged us as being the top performer in our category with business customers, and we have one of the lowest rates in looking at the largest cities across the U.S. with investor-owned utilities.
I think the other point I\'d like to make on the earnings. I think you\'re going to see relatively a flat earnings when you take out the effects of major outages and weather going forward. I just wanted to point that out.
I\'m going to spend a little bit of time in this slide because I think this is a critical slide in terms of -- in capital expenditures. We\'re going to spend about $1 billion, over $1 billion complying with some environmental regulations going forward with IPL. And that does a couple of things. I think one thing, just a fundamental shift in our regulatory strategy. So our regulatory strategy, if you look over the past decade, and it\'s really to get along with the regulators as much as we can, kind of stay out of the regulatory arena and keep high margins as long as possible.
With these expenditures, we\'re going to be in the radar. We\'re going have to have a rate case to recover some of these dollars, and so it\'s going to be, like I said, a fundamental shift in terms of how we interact with the regulator and what our expectations are. So if you look at driver of this, the driver is primarily the utility MATS rule that EPA issued. And it does 2 things. So you look at the top bullet on the screen, the Mercury and Air Toxics Standards. And it\'s 63% of the coal that\'s scrubbed on the pie chart. Those are the baseload units, so we get 5 baseload units at IPL. 4 -- a couple are installed in this city at the Petersburg plant and 1 in the city of Indianapolis. But those units we\'re going to have to put additional control equipment on it. And that control equipment costs over about over $0.5 billion. We filed for a recovery of that last fall. We expect a ruling by the commission in June some time. I think it\'s also important to note that with those 2 primary intervenors, we\'ve agreed with them, the intervenors, the consumer counselor and the large industrial customers are now supporting our filing going forward. I think we also, also important to note in terms of taking risk out of it with the cost of the project to once we implement it, is that we\'ve got an EPC contract associated with this. And we\'re expected, assuming we get approval in June, we\'ll start this in the fall of this year with an outage at Petersburg 2, and then the control equipments will continue to be -- we\'ll continue to work on that through compliance dates of April 2016.
If I shift over to the CCGT, so the bottom bullet. So we\'re looking at building a combined cycle gas turbine at the Eagle Valley site, as indicated before. And if you look back to the pie chart again, the 14% and the 7% of the unscrubbed coal and the oil, we\'re basically going to have to most likely retire those units as a result of that same utility MATS rule.
So with that, we\'ll look to build new facility to replace that generation. We conducted an RFP internally. We had over 20 people bid on that. Once we analyze that, our assessment was that the best solution, the least cost solution for our customers was to build a plant ourself at this facility, given the locational advantages of being on a brownfield-type site. So we\'re looking to build that. I think where we\'re at in that process, we just filed for that last week with the commission. We expect that approval process to take approximately 1 year, and then construction begin after approval. We would have that in place -- placed in service in April 2017 would be the timeframe.
So I think, so again, I think -- the other part of this slide that I\'d like to point out is Indiana, you go to the quality of the legislation and regulation again on the state. And one of the things that we have is the Powerplant Recovery Act. And the Powerplant Recovery Act is 2 things, one is that it requires an approval by the commission of a certificate of public need and necessity -- public excuse me, CPCN, certificate of public need -- convenience and necessity. So you need approval of that from the commission before you can go forward with any of these types of projects. And so that approval process includes public hearings and you have the intervenors, of course, involved in it. But the upside of that is that once that\'s approved, at that point in time, then you\'re, in essence, guaranteed recovery on and of the investment. And that even if the project is subsequently canceled. And that\'s by law in Indiana.
I think the other thing, just I\'ll point out, when I started on this slide is that this will put us in a rate case at some point in time. We have not determined the exact time that we\'re going to file that. It can go on [indiscernible] take into account. One is the new legislation that\'s in effect. We\'ll have to analyze that. It\'s a recovery of the capacity cost, which would probably be other significant component of that. So we\'ll continue to assess that, and we\'ll file when it\'s optimal for us to do so.
Shift over to DPL. So DPL, so even though that we\'re moving to a competitive environment in Ohio, on the left side, our service territory, the T&D customers, that\'s still exclusive franchise. So that is not competition on T&D side. We\'ll continue to serve those customers for those types of services. On the generation side, I think it\'s 3 things I\'d like to point out. Differences when we take a look at difference between Dayton Power & Light and Indianapolis Power & Light. So the first one is what I mentioned before, they\'re moving to a competitive environment where IPL is traditionally regulated.
I think the second one is, we\'ve talked about the effect of utility mass and the regulations that has in the cost that IPL will incur. DPL is not in the same situation. They do not have the material costs associated with utility mass for the plants we have in Dayton. And then the last one is the plants they are jointly owned. So IPL\'s plants are wholly-owned. The baseload generation at DPL is jointly owned with AEP or Duke and AEP.
Business drivers. To look at business drivers at DPL, on the T&D side, there\'s lots of requirement in terms of the T&D side of the business. We\'ve met those requirements and it\'s essentially put in place. You look at the T&D and the reliability. We ranked on top in the state of Ohio. I think on the J.D. Power survey that measures customer satisfaction, we made tremendous improvements since we\'ve owned DPL, so we continue to make improvements there.
On the generation side, it\'s a little bit different. The first thing and on the next slide or, I guess, a couple of slides in, I\'m going to talk about the ESP of current rate proceeding. It\'s critical we get the quality up from that proceeding beside to that. It\'s number one.
The second thing is gas prices. So with gas prices depressed, that is a critical business driver to us in terms of what we can get for our margins on the generating facilities. And then the other one is capacity prices. I continue to be frustrated with capacity prices still significantly below the cost of new entry and it appears that that\'s not going to change in this upcoming auction.
And the last thing to point out is the cost improvements. Andy talked about being operationally excellent. We need to continue to improve availability at our plants and lower the cost structure at the same time and we have initiatives to do that.
And the last in these drivers that I want to talk to -- Tom O\'Flynn is going to talk later today. I\'m going to let him talk about the debt restructuring we have at DPL.
So the competitive market\'s considerations. Three different components. The first one is energy hedging. So the 3 different components we have for our energy. The first one is tariff customers.  About 28% of energy goes to tariff customers. Those are actually the highest margin customers. We prefer to do that, but we\'ll switching now and will continue to decline over time. So that\'s something that we\'d like to keep high, but it\'s not going to stay at that level. It\'ll continue to go down.
Second one is wholesale. We placed about 5% in wholesale. That has the lowest margins. And then the last group is on the retail side, primarily through DPLER. We\'ve got about 67% of earnings goes through the retail channel, again higher-margin and much more clearly efficient than on the wholesale side.
Our retail business through DPLER, we\'ve got about 250,000 customers located in Ohio and the Illinois. It\'s where those customers are.
On capacity -- on the capacity side, again, it\'s -- if you look at the upcoming capacity auction we have coming in May, our anticipation is that we\'ll have price somewhere in the area of the last 2 auctions. We don\'t anticipate to see a price increase, and again the frustrating thing is that that\'s always off from the cost of new entry. And over time, you got to believe it could get to that level, but we\'re not there today. I think the prices will remain in the same level to where they have been. There\'s more import capability and so I -- we don\'t anticipate significant change there.
Let\'s talk about the DPL rate proceedings. So just if you take a look at the chart here, this is the 5 key items that are associated with the current proceeding that we have. I think in terms of schedule, we expect the decision at the end of July or the last half of July. If you look at the various components of that -- now I grouped the first 3 items kind of together, the non-bypassable charge, the switching tracker, and the ESP term, because what that\'s about is basically the financial stability. And to be able to continue as we transition to a competitive market, it\'s the -- it\'s financial stability to be able to operate reliably and safely during that period of time of transition. So non-bypassable charge is, in our view, the most important item that we have. I think it\'s positive to note that commission staff\'s numbers are near our numbers. And so again, we don\'t know how the commission -- commissioners will rule, but I think it\'s a positive sign that the Staff sees it as very similar to what we do.
The switching tracker. That switching tracker, basically, if it\'s customer switch, I think it is designed to keep your orders to minimize the impacts of that. Staff had 0 for the switching tracker. They basically see the switching tracker non-bypassables, it\'s interchangeable and they put all the dollars in the non-bypassable component of it.
I think the ESP terms, or the length of the terms, we obviously prefer to get these revenues for a longer period of time. We\'ve closed 5 years. Staff had 3 years. Staff\'s position is basically consistent with other rulings that the commission has had in the past.
Transition to market.  This is how fast the tariff of customers get market pricing. A little bit of double-edged sword here.  If you don\'t change this at all, if you don\'t lower the price, your customers are going to switch off faster. You\'ll lose that margin. And so you want some transition there, but you\'d like to hold on to that market as long as you can. So we\'re 1 year different than what our proposal is and what Staff ended up with.
And then generation separation is the last key component of it. And it really gets into a lot of the financing arrangement, a lot of the terms you have of the financial agreements. It\'s the one you can physically separate and so we believe that we put a good case in front of the commission in terms of the time frame that we\'ve got proposed here.
Key takeaways. So I think our company is -- if you take a look at the PTC trends.  Again, we\'ll see a decline when compared to past years in terms of -- with the DPL\'s customer switching. We\'ll tend to lose margin as a result of that.
In 2013, we\'ve got the long -- the maintenance outage at the IPL to accommodate the utility mass, but also we got a long outage and also the impact of weather. I think the past couple of years, we had very hot summers and so we always anticipate normal weather.
If you look at it longer term, we had a positive impacts of Wind and also positive impacts of the traffic associated with the IPL MATS project.
So I said might as well, it\'s good the takeaways that I\'ll leave you with. Again, the U.S. generation business, I think, is a low-risk business, and we\'re set up well for the next 5 years in terms of a low-risk environment. We\'re also set up for investment with the location that we have in the Southland assets and in the need that competitive advantage we have is we\'ll look going forward there.
At IPL, I think just reinforce that the regulatory environment, legislative environment at IPL is extremely favorable. I believe that\'s a quiet environment. We don\'t anticipate any change in that in the future, foreseeable future. I think then with DPL, we need a quality outcome of this ESP. And I think that, that\'s critical to us and then we have to move towards generation separation and be prepared for that.
So that concludes my remarks. I\'ll introduce Felipe Ceron to talk about the Andes.
Felipe Ceron
Good morning. Thank you for joining us this morning. My name is Felipe Ceron. I\'m going to present the Andes SBU.
First, I\'m going to give an overview of the SBU, then into more detail on AES Gener, which is the largest business in the unit, a discussion of the main markets, Chile and Colombia, then I\'m going to go into AES Argentina and finally some takeaways from -- on the presentation.
This SBU is composed of 2 large generating companies, AES Gener and AES Argentina. It has operations in 3 countries, Argentina, Colombia and Chile, which are, after Brazil, the second, third and fourth largest economies in South America.
We have a total aggregating installed capacity of 8 gigawatts. Gener, which has operations in Chile, Colombia and [indiscernible] Argentina, which has both the Chile and Argentina has a capacity of 5.1 gigawatts, which amount to 63% of the capacity in the SBU.
In 2012, we have an adjusted PTC of some $369 million and which Gener contributed with 39% of that amount.
Now going to -- into more detail on Gener. Gener is very diversified in terms of geography, technology and customer base. They have plants throughout Northern and Central Chile and single plants in Colombia and Argentina. We\'re also diversifying technology. We have hydro-generation dam base and run-of-river, on thermal, burning coal, gas and oil, and we have a very wide customer base, large oil-related customers, mining companies, industrial customers and also declusion companies in Chile and Colombia.
We have declined in our PTC from 2011 to 2012 due mainly of determination of the export of our plants in Argentina into Northern Chile. Then temporary in balance between our contractual commitments and our efficient generation caused for some outages that we have in 2012.
And also because of the delay in the Ventanas IV plant that Andy mentioned early, that have stopped operation in March of this year. That was partially offset by the starting of operation for Angamos plant in Northern Chile.
Now more details in the main markets in which we operate in Gener, which has 2 main markets: Chile and Colombia, which are among the most attractive markets in the Latin America region. Chile has the highest-grade rating in Latin America. The country\'s has deep liquid and well-developed capital market for both equity and debt. We have a very stable and constructive regulatory environment for power generation that dates back to 1982. And its aspect country keeps growing demand -- power demand has been growing very strong in the last 20 to 30 years and is expected to continue growing. We\'re estimating a need for around 700 megawatts of new capacity per year in order to provide for the growing demand.
Gener is the oldest generating company in Chile, and AES have been in Chile since late 2000 when it acquired a controlling interest in Gener. We are also the second largest power generating company in the country, with 19% of the installed capacity and given that we have higher plant factor that most of the system -- our generation is close to 30% of the total demand.
The other main market for Gener is Colombia. Colombia is also an investment-grade country with also constructive and stable regulatory environment for the power generation that has been in place since 1994. Demand has been growing very strongly as well. We expect that the country will need around 450 megawatts of new capacity per year in order to provide for this growing demand. We are the fifth largest generating company in the country, amounting to 7% of the total installed capacity.
Now AES Gener as a company, Gener is among the 20 largest of public listed company in the country in terms of market capitalization. AES owns 71% of Gener and 16% is owned by local financial funds.
Gener has an investment-grade rating by Standard & Poor\'s and Moody\'s, one notch above investment grade by Fitch.
In the last 7 years, we have a very significant return on our stock for our shareholders. In the graph there, we have the evolution of the IPSA. The IPSA is the index that comprises the 40 more trader stocks in Chile. The IPSA has had a return of 142% in this year-on-year, whereas Gener has more than 460%. We have also increased in the same view with our market capitalization from $1 billion in \'05 to $5.9 billion as of May this year.
We have made significant investments in the last 2 years from 2006. Until March this year, we have had other new capacity, increasing Gener\'s installed capacity by almost 50%, all of that in Chile. With an investment of $3 billion, we have added 1,700 gigawatts -- 1,700 megawatts of new capacity, doubling our install capacity in Chile. This includes 8 power plants. And also in a storage systems, the first large body storage system in the world were built by us in Chile. Now the largest one is also owned by us, by AES, in the U.S. but the second largest are in Chile. This has very high technology. It makes a very good contribution in Chile by substituting spending reserve.
This investment that we\'ve submitted in the last 2 year represented 50% of the base load that has been built in the country, making us of the company that has invested the most in the power sector in Chile. And we have been not only the one that have invested the most, but also the most successful in terms of the performance in our -- in construction by building the plants [indiscernible] on a scale of buyout.
We have also, as a result of that, doubled the EBITDA of the AES Gener from \'06 to 2012. And we also have a very interesting future. As I said, we\'ll finish this large investment of 1,700 megawatts, but we are now starting some 3 new larger projects with an average capacity of 1.2 gigawatts, which I\'m going to describe with more detail later, with an investment of $3.5 billion. And we have also started a smaller project in Colombia to heat up 20 megawatts.
In Chile, we operate in the 2 largest markets in the country, the so-called SIC, which is the Central/Southern Grid, which covers 90% of the population, and the SING in the north, which is the most important mining district in the country. We also have TermoAndes in Northern Argentina that is connected to both the Argentinian system and the Chilean system.
TermoAndes exported into SING until late 2011. Now we are working with the both the Chilean and Argentinian governments and with also the system operators of both countries in order to make this line operation and not just to export from Argentina into Chile, but also from Chile into Argentina. This is the largest transmission -- largest international transmission line that Chile has and the second largest that the government has. We expect to have it operationally by the end of this year, and this would be new income for us in terms of toll payments and also export from one country into the other.
Our business strategy in Chile is based mainly into contracting our efficient capacity into long-term PPAs. By efficient capacity, we mean the capacity that it has a variable cost that it\'s lower than the market price of energy. We have contracted almost 70% of our capacity, which is the efficient capacity and the remaining terms of the PPA that would have some 12 years.  All those contracts are denominated in US dollars and have either pass-through clauses of our cost or are indexed to our main cost.
The remaining 32% of our capacity is less efficient, but it\'s available for dry years in the central region. The SIC, the system is based to a significant extent in hydrology and will benefit in very dry years [ph] by producing with this inefficient capacity of selling of a high price in the stock market and also in very good years but reproducing even our baseload generation and buying cheap in the spot market. We received capacity payments for all of our generation and we\'ll also have that contracted long-term.
In 2012, we experienced, as I said, a temporary imbalance in terms of our contractual commitments, our efficient capacity as a result of some outages that are -- were related to some boiler too that we\'d have to change in our old plants, that has already been solved, and some design situations in our Angamos plant that has already been solved, and also because of the delay in Ventanas IV that started operations in March of this year. So all of that is already behind us.
Now going to the expansion in the future that I mentioned earlier, we have 3 platform expansions in Chile, amounting to a total of 1.2 gigawatts and $3.5 billion investments to our Rey [ph] continuation.
The first one is our Guacolda V plant that Andres mentioned earlier. Guacolda V is adjacent to our other 4 units in the Guacolda Peninsula in the northern part of the SIC. This plant is exactly the same as the 4 units that we have and it\'s being built by the same EPC contractor, Mitsubishi, with a total project cost of $450 million. It\'s fully contracted with a mining customer in the north of the SIC. We started the construction in October last year. We expected to start the commercial operations in the second half of 2015.
The second plan for expansion, it\'s Cochrane. Cochrane is an expansion of our existing Angamos facility in the SING. It consists of 2 units of 532 megawatts with the same design of Angamos and the same EPC contractor, Bosco. Mitsubishi have joined us in this venture. They acquired 40% of Cochrane in November last year and will have secured the financing for the project in March in this year for $1 billion [indiscernible] from Japan and Korea and also some bank from the Far East. The total project cost is $1.4 billion. We have secured long-term PPAs with 3 large mining customers in the north of Chile with a term of 19 years, and this project also include an energy storage system.
We are scheduling the COD of the first unit for the second quarter of 2016 and the fourth -- and the second unit last quarter of 2016.
Considering these 2 projects already under construction, Guacolda V and Cochrane will have a total under construction of 684 megawatts. That\'s nearly half of the capacity that is under construction in Chile today.
The third platform expansion is Alto Maipo. This is 531 megawatt run-of-river powerplant consisting of 2 units. It\'s an expansion of our existing Alfalfal plant, 500 -- sorry, 50 kilometers east of Santiago.
It\'s in a very advanced stage of development. We have the environmental permit, the water permit,  the civil construction permits. We also have been granted the electrical concession and we are almost finished with the preliminary work. And we\'re in the process of -- in the last stages of negotiating the financing, the PPAs and also considering incorporating a partner within Cochrane. We expect to initiate construction by the end of the year and achieve COD in 2018. The total project cost is estimated at $1.7 billion.
Apart from these 3 platform expansions, we have other projects in our pipeline. We have our permitting project, a coal project in the SIC of 750 megawatts and a solar project in the north of Chile of 220 megawatts.
We\'re also considering some adjacent projects like desalination. Chile is a dry country. Particularly in the north, there\'s a significant need for desalinated dam hydroplant. It\'s the third largest plant in the country, which amounts to 7% of the total installed capacity.
In Colombia, we contract most of our generation. We generate -- we go to around 85% of what we generate for a single year. Contract signed in the range of 1 to 4 years. We sell the balance around 15% in the spot markets. We also received reliability payment, which amounts to around $44 million per year and hydrology in Colombia, it\'s much more stable in Chile. There\'s less variation. So with this, a more stable hydrology and this reliability payment, that provide for a more favorable PTC in spite of not having very long-term contracts. We have last year started our first project in Colombia since we have acquired Chivor. Tunjita is a 20-megawatt hydro. It\'s also a platform expansion that takes advantage of the water right that we have of there and the infrastructure that we have at Chivor. It\'s a $60 million investments and COD is expected for mid-2014.
Now Argentina. We\'ve been in Argentina since 1992. And we have been, in spite of the challenging environment there, we have been making money in Argentina in our generation businesses every single year since then. We are the third largest generator in the country. We are the most diversified with almost 3 gigawatts of capacity. That\'s 11% of the installed capacity. We are the most diversified. We have the only coal plant in the country, which is the lowest coal producer. All our thermal plants are dual, which means that they can burn more than one fuel. Our coal plants can also burn natural gas and our combined cycle, that\'s Gener [indiscernible] can also burn diesel oil, which gives us significant flexibility. The business environment in Argentina is challenging, also the macroeconomic conditions. However, we have -- we\'re in a very -- we have very good assets and in a very good position once this situation recovers in the future. There has been recent changes in the regulation in Argentina in which the remuneration of the generating companies has been modified to a scheme similar to cost-plus. These changes have some positive and negative news for us. There are a few items still to be defined. We are actively engaged with the government in order to finalize the definition of those items and minimize the negative impact on us and maximize the benefits.
We expected to be fully defined by the end of June. On balance, this -- we expect it to be slightly negative as compared to our expectation for this year, but anyhow, better than that we have in 2012. Demand continues to grow very strong in Argentina; more power will be needed and we\'re going to expect a very good position once this business environment and the macroeconomic situation improves in the country.
Finally, some summary, some conclusions and takeaways for this SBU. In Chile, we are in a very strong position, the second largest generator but the one that has grown the most in the last few years. And also we expect to be the one that grows the most. In the near future, we\'ll have the most attractive pipeline of projects and we have been the most successful in building the new power plants.
In Colombia, we also have a strong position. It\'s also a very attractive and growing market. We have made the first, we expect, of many of new projects in the country and expect to leverage in our good position there, and also in our track record and knowledge in developing and building power plants as AES Gener.
In Argentina, we have excellent assets, very well diversified, and I expect them to improved conditions in that country sometime in the future.
Now in some trends for short term. In 2013, in the first quarter as compared to 2012, we\'ll have lower PTC mainly due to a lower dispatch of our gas plant in Chile. In Chile, there was the addition of coal plants not only from our side, but also from our competitors that pushed down the spot prices and reduced the dispatch of our gas plant there. And we\'ll also have a lower hydrology in Colombia.
However, for the overall year, we expect an increase in PTC in that range of 5% to 15%. So we expect that for the rest of the year. We will not only cover the shortfall but also increased. That will be because we have now Ventanas IV operating. Starting in March, that will be a big help. And also last year, we have the outages that I\'ve mentioned that were particularly challenging in the second quarter of 2012. These were related, as I said, to some change in the tubes of the boiler of one of our Ventanas plants that has already solved and some design prod that we haven\'t [indiscernible] in Angamos that has already been solved, so we should have a significantly better availability for the rest of the year.
Going forward from 2015, we\'ll have again availability our Tunjita project and we expect to also to have operation on the interconnection between Chile and Argentina going both ways on collecting toll payments. We also expect to have -- take advantage of our adjacency with the desalination capacity.
Medium to long term, 2016 onwards, the 3 platform expansions that I mentioned in Chile, Guacolda V, Cochrane and Alto Maipo. In Colombia, we expect to have some more growth opportunities beyond Tunjita. On Argentina, long-term potential once the macroeconomic situation and the business situation also improves in that country.
Thank you very much for your attention. And now I would like to introduce Britaldo Soares, our President of Brazil SBU.
Britaldo Pedrosa Soares
Good morning. I\'m pleased to be here to give you an overview on the Brazil SBU. We\'re basically give you an overview of how our market works, what we have ahead and then speak about our specific businesses.
This is the business we have in Brazil. We have approximately 8 million customers in distribution.
In concessionaire, it\'s covered by Eletropaulo and Sul. Eletropaulo is the largest distribution company in Brazil. And in 2012, our PTC performance has been heavily affected by the outcome of the 2012 tariff resets. Sul is our distribution company in the south. We have 1.2 million customers there, and Sul has been a consistent contributor of PTC over the last 3 years. In 2012, it has brought 152 million to our adjusted PTC.
On the generation side, AES Tiete is our main business. And it represents 80% of our generation capacity, 100% hydro and it\'s a business fully contracted until 2015. Uruguaiana, as Andy mentioned at the beginning, is our combined cycle gas plant in the border with Argentina. That we have just, after 4 years, put in operation for 60 days to help the recovery of the reservoirs in Brazil, given the low hydrology we\'re seeing. And we\'re in negotiations to put it to long-term service.
Now I\'ll move to some of the market aspects. Brazil is a large, large market, but very competitive. The overall energy demand in Brazil exceeded, it\'s likely, 500,000 gigawatt hour in 2012. And we expect an average 4% growth until 2021. 70% of the market is represented by regulated utilities and 25% by unregulated free large industrial and commercial clients. This kind of demand growth that we see requires the increase of 5 to 6 gigawatts in new capacity every year.
The new projects are competitively bid, except those that are going to supply exclusively the free market. Our energy matrix is mostly hydro, and we will continue to be hydro, on average, approximately 70%. But the new hydro project have been mostly run of the river with limited reservoir capacity. Wind energy has grown substantially in the recent years, and we expect it to continue growing and represent 40% of the capacity soon to be auctioned. The low hydrology that we have seen in the country has increased the requirement for thermal dispatch to provide more dispatch-ability and secure supply in the country. Given that we see thermal energy also increasing its participation in the matrix, and today, the existing capacity represents 20% of the total generation in the country.
Now I\'ll give you the highlights on the regulatory framework that we have. Our Brazilian utilities go through tariff resets every 4 to 5 years. These resets are based on return on asset model, with a weighted average cost of capital defined by the regulator. Currently, the after-tax return is 7.5% and it was reduced from 9.95% in the prior third cycle.  And the hour utility is also -- are entitled to an inflation based adjustment and the pass-through of energy and transmission cost.
The latest tariff reset, which was the third tariff reset in the country since privatization at the end of the \'90s, has been much more rigorous than the previous ones, tightened margins and established greater quality of services requirements.
Eletropaulo and Sul, our distribution companies have their resets in July 2012 and Sul just had it in April 2013. And I will comment on those 2 specific businesses in the slides ahead.
Overall, what we have seen in the country is a lower -- is a pressure for lower cost of energy to favor local industry competitiveness and inflation control. Last September 2012, the Brazilian government has introduced the cost reduction -- a tariff to cost reduction program, lowering the tariffs by an average of 20%. And that program has been funded through 2 major sources. The first one was the reduction of sector charge. We charge similar to taxes in Brazil and are based by all the companies in the sector, and also by low OEM tough conditions for the renewal of concessions expiring between 2015 and \'17. Our businesses have had limited index because our concessions expired between 2027 and 2029.
However, the perception of increased uncertainties in the sector has affected the overall sector\'s stock performances, and our stocks have also been affected.  And we will see that ahead.
This is the hydrological evolution in Brazil. And we have put a comparison to 2001 and because that year was the year of a 20% mandatory consumption reduction across the country. And as you can see, we ended 2012 with the reservoirs at the 30% level of their total capacity.  That is due to weaker rains and also to a reduced storage capacity in the system, given the new projects being run of the river.
To recover the reservoirs\' insecure supply, the thermal dispatch has been increased since the fourth quarter of 2012 and we expect the Brazilian government to be a bit more cautious with the reservoir levels since 2014 is the year of elections and the worst of [ph].
The thermal dispatch is expected to be maintained between 9 to 13 gigawatts, and we expect that to go through the end of 2013.
With this situation in the country, GSA just had in the first quarter of 2013 an impact on its PTC of approximately $16 million. And looking forward to the end of the year, depending upon the level of dispatch, we are estimating an incremental impact that can range from $11 million to $35 million, depending on the dispatch.
There has been recently a lot of discussions about the ration risk in Brazil. But when we ask the hydrological evolution and combine that with the current thermal dispatch capacity in the country of approximately 14 gigawatts, we do not foresee ration risk as the relevant one in the short and medium term.
We\'re now moving to Tiet\xc3\xaa. As I mentioned before, Tiet\xc3\xaa is fully contracted with Eletropaulo until the end of 2015 at very attractive commercial terms. And as mentioned by Andy before, we have done a review of our asset management and an OEM process in Tiet\xc3\xaa and we have obtained the certification under PAS 55 of the British Standards Institute. What\'s the benefit of that? Over the last 3 years, we have reduced the downtime of our generation units by 75%. The stability of the Tiet\xc3\xaa revenue stream until 2015 and our strong operational reliability is what drives our PTC performance and that has been the case for the last 3 years. We expect a consistent performance when looking forward to 2015, even considering the potential impact of this hydrology risk sharing that we have seen in the first quarter.
Looking ahead, one of the major challenge for Tiet\xc3\xaa is contracting our energy beyond 2015, with the end of the Eletropaulo PPA. Our strategy has been to access the free market, contracting with large industrials and large commercial customers, seems that market have offered more attractive commercial terms today. In contrast, debt on average terms range from 3 to 5 years.
We also see another reason to focus on this market is that recent change introduced -- that has been introduced in the market like the change in the spot price calculation, the decrease of the proportion of water storage capacity with the new hydro projects being run-of-the-river and the higher thermal requirements looking forward and more restrictive conditions for wind energy. These factors can bring an upward trend in the free market prices. We also have, beyond 2016, challenging to expand our capacity and suddenly [ph] we\'re focusing on the development of 2 thermal plants. Thermal plants in the state of S\xc3\xa3o Paulo, of approximately 1,100 megawatts. And those 2 projects are pending securing gas supply and also winning one of the energy auctions for the end of the deal. We have also found [ph] some M&A efforts, more directly to the Wind energy segment as one of the alternatives to grow our capacity.
We\'re now moving to Eletropaulo. As I mentioned, Eletropaulo is the largest distribution company in the country with 6.5 million customers, highly concentrated in residential and commercial segments, which together, represent approximately 74% of our revenues. Eletropaulo had its third tariff reset in July 2012, and it came 1 year after the original date, given the longer time taken by the regulators to finalize the methodology for that to be set. It was the various review reset and came below our expectations and it have impacted our PTC performance in 2012, as I mentioned in the beginning.
We have a pending administrative review with the regulator, and we expect it to be concluded and the outcome implemented with our July \'13 annual tariff adjustment. We have asked that the regulator to review its prior position with regard our asset base and reconsider assets excluded from prior tariff cycle\'s asset base and increase the recognition of incremental regulatory investments made between 2007 and 2011.
Given the significant impacts of the tariff reset in the increased cost of energy from the higher thermal dispatch that we have seen in the first quarter of this year, we have renegotiated our financial covenants, and we expect to go back to the 3.5x adjusted EBITDA that we originally have in the third quarter of this year. We have seen growth in demand at an average of 2.7% per annum over the last 5 years in Eletropaulo\'s concessionaire. And we expect it to continue increasing as Brazil grows in a more steady step. In addition, to this, with our operational excellence, basically cost and efficience management quite often serves as further improvement, helps to drive value ahead and we\'re going to be able -- we\'re going to be speak about efficiency programs in the slide ahead.
We\'re now moving to see the stock performance that our 2 listed companies have had compared to the Sao Paulo Stock Exchange. Basically, Eletropaulo\'s performance has been impacted by the third tariff reset with the severe outcome that we had. And more recently, we all saw the impact of the increased cost of synergies has further impacted the stock performance. But overall, when we take a longer term view, Eletropaulo has outperformed the stock market since the end of 2005, primarily due to the increasing earnings and high dividend payments that we have had between 2007 and 2010. With regard Tiet\xc3\xaa, our stock -- Tiet\xc3\xaa has consistently outperformed the Stock Exchange, but given the introduction of the tariff reduction program in September 2012, the stock has suffered with the perception of more uncertainties in the Brazilian electricity sector.
Now going to Sul. Sul is our distribution business in the south and in comparison with Eletropaulo, it operates in a much less dense concessionaire, which is 20x the size of Eletropaulo. And the seasonality of the agri business in the region drives our revenues on the first quarter of each year. Demand growth that we have seen has averaged 3.4% per annum over the last 5 years, while the regional GDP has grown 2.5% per annum.
We expect economic growth to continue driving demand in the region. And as Sul have had PTC performance driven by the demand growth, relevant improvements of quality of services, and the efficiency focus that we have dedicated to our cost structure and a debt refinancing process initiated in 2007 with substantially strengthening of Sul\'s capital structure and financial cost reduction.
This financial restructuring has allowed Sul to makes its first dividend payment in 2011 and increase the payout to 63% in 2012. Sul has just passed its third tariff reset and opposite Eletropaulo, have had a positive outcome on that reset. It came online -- in line with our expectations. The asset base was fairly recognized, and we see that driving value in this entire cycle until 2018.
And as I mentioned before, annually, we have tariff adjustments, and the next one for Sul will be April 2014.
We\'re now moving -- we are now giving examples here of what kind of work will we have done on cost management and efficiency. We have developed and implemented a series of initiatives over time, and that has been combined with increasing investments in technology and automation of our operational process. These technology investments and automations have been concentrated in a higher scale on our distribution business operations because of their nature.
And overall, in the last 3 years, through our major projects, [indiscernible] we have achieved $185 million of P&L contributions, which came in the form of cost reduction, increasing revenues for the [indiscernible]. On the right-hand side, you can see the comparison of people, materials, services and other expenses that we have in our distribution business, comparing to our peers in the industry. We expect to achieve savings of $60 million for the entire SBU in 2013. Most of this value is associated to AES Eletropaulo.
More recently, we have also concentrated and consolidated our nonfuel activities in Eletropaulo -- of Eletropaulo in a new headquarters, together with our SBU corporate functions.
In addition to the association, it had overhead expense reduction.  That has also freed to divestment approximately $125 million in real estate properties and 70% of those real estate have already been sold.
So we will now cover Uruguaiana, our combined cycle thermal plants in the south of Brazil. Uruguaiana is a project that has been designed to import gas from Argentina, and it started operations in the year 2000. We wrote off the investment in 2007 and stopped commercial operations in 2008, given lack of gas supply from Argentina. The recent low hydrology and the higher thermal dispatch requirement in Brazil has brought a unique opportunity to put Uruguaiana back on surface.
After operating for the 60-day emergency period that we mentioned before, we\'re now in a negotiation in process with the Brazilian and the Argentinian governments to have the 2 countries sharing the output of the plant in a long-term service agreement.
Gas would be supplied by Brazil or Argentina, according to their needs. Our expectation is to achieve an agreement this year, and that may also contribute to the resolution of an arbitration that we have pending with YPF, the regional gas supplier to Uruguaiana, when we stopped the commercial operations.
So moving to the takeaways and giving you the key message that we see for our businesses ahead. Well, first of all, with regard to our utilities, the resolution of the pending tariff review in Eletropaulo and the prior years after today\'s discussion, those 2 are key drivers for Eletropaulo looking ahead. And we see the outcome of that, as I mentioned before, done in July \'13. And beyond that, demand growth in our operational estimates, we will continue creating value either in Sul and Eletropaulo. With regard our generation business, as I mentioned, the major value drivers for Tiet\xc3\xaa is the contracting of our energy beyond 2015, and disciplined investment in expanding our capacity beyond that year.
Our SBU first quarter PTC, as Tom is going to comment ahead, came below our expectations and has been affected by 2 major factors: the low hydrology in Tiet\xc3\xaa that I mentioned at the beginning and lower demand in Sul. Overall, we expect our adjusted PTC in the year to remain relatively stable.
Now I\'ll pass back to our COO, Andrew Vesley. And thank you very much.
Andrew Martin Vesley
Okay. What I\'m going to do and try to do relatively quickly, since we\'re running just a bit behind and we want to stay on the schedule that\'s in front of you, is to cover the remaining 3 SBUs, but I\'m going to do that at relatively higher level and really tell you the way I think about those businesses, what I think is important to help give you context as you look at the information. And quite often, because I am always somewhere between Washington and New York, I\'m always available to you to talk more about these issues.
So let\'s go on. If you go back to that PTC wheel, these 3 SBUs represent about 47% of the 2012 adjusted PTC, so they are still significant.
First thing that I want to talk about is Mexico, Central America and Caribbean, which, in and of itself, represent 18% of that PTC. But more than 50% of that is actually generated by our business in the DR. And I specifically want to talk a little bit more about that.
But just to give you sort of the cook\'s tour.  If we look at this SBU, it -- Mexico is there. Mexico is the 11th largest economy in the world. It -- if you look at all of the Latin America, not just South America, it\'s the second largest economy after Brazil. We have a combined population of about 140 million people represented here. And Panama is actually one of the fastest growing economies in the world at about 8% per annum.
In Mexico, our philosophy is what we call self-service. We build plants and operate for industrial customers. We\'ll talk about TEG/TEP. That is a fluidized -- 2 fluidized bed plants on petcoke, and we also have a -- just over 400-megawatt combined cycle called Merida. And again, that\'s 100% dedicated to industrial offtakers. We are interested in the Mexico market. We will look for more of these self-serve opportunities, and we do think it\'s a market of interest. And stay tuned because we may be doing more there.
As we drop south to El Salvador, it\'s purely a distribution business. We have 4 of the 5 distribution businesses. We operate them as a single company. The major driver there is, of course, regulatory outcome. In 2012, we had a tariff reset. It gets reset every 5 years, so most of the regulatory risks for the next number of years is out. We got a result that had no surprises and was at the higher end of our expectations. So it\'s a very good regulatory outcome. Things to be concerned about is always the fiscal condition of the country and tariff levels, as there are certain levels of subsidies in that market. The other is generation investments. Hopefully, there will be generation investments in diversity of the energy source, and it\'s something that we will encourage and enable and not necessarily participate in, but it is one of the things that we are watching.
Panama, we\'re all hydro. We have 5 plants.  Some are in the river, some reservoir, where about 40% of the generation -- you may be hearing about hydrology. It\'s getting very severe in Panama. We\'ve had a very extended dry season. There was a wet season and a dry season. We should have been out of the dry season already. Reservoirs are extremely low. The government has announced some issues. I think today they\'ll start talking about potentially rolling blackouts. Government offices are closed -- has to close everyday between 11 and 3 -- all generation not hooked into the system, as people are asking for that to be run. And schools have been closed this week in Panama. We anticipate, in the end of May, to have the rains begin, but this is a significant issue. Tom will talk to some of the potential impacts on our -- that has in terms of the numbers.
So let\'s talk about the Dominican Republic, and what I want to let you know. This is about half of that $400 million PTC, and we expect it to continue to deliver at that level. We essentially have 3 businesses here. We have a gas generation business, which is made up of the Andres plant, which is a combined cycle; and something that\'s called DPP, it used to be Dominican Power Partners, which are open-cycle gas turbines. All of that gas was provided through our regasification facility, which is mostly provided by gas from DP [ph] and a very attractive Henry Hub long-term gas supply contract.
We also have the only coal plant on the island. So collectively, we present and provide the lowest-cost generation and we\'re always dispatched. This contract is very interesting that we have with gas because we provide a majority of the benefits of that low-priced gas contract to the public sector. And that\'s very important because we become critically important to this government, to the country and it gives us a very good place to be in stakeholder management.
As you know, the electric sector is problematic in Dominican Republic. But because of the quality of our assets, these contracts and our stakeholder management, we\'ve been able to drive very, very good margins there.
Now let me give you a sense of how to think about it. And I\'m going to talk in terms now of revenue, not PTC. And I will not talk about PTC because that can somehow interfere with negotiations I have going on in a lot of different fronts in the DR.
Our revenue from selling electricity out of our plants is about just north of 70% of the revenue that\'s produced in this business. Of that, probably less than 50%, probably 45%, goes to the distribution businesses, which were all publicly-owned, and that\'s where you have the collection risks. So 45% of our electricity revenue goes to the public sector through the publicly-owned distribution businesses. The rest go to high-quality offtakers, mining, industrials and others through PPAs.
We also have -- we do auxiliary services out of our plants. So about 22% of our revenue goes to the market operator in terms of frequency regulation, which is a very, very attractive source of revenue for us.
The last, as what I talked about earlier, which is gas at the plant sense [ph]. So the -- excuse me, 8% of it was in the auxillary services, the 22% is from the gas sales. So as you can see, it\'s a diversified business with a relatively smaller portion that\'s exposed to the collection issues.
We think that we have very good platforms here, and we are looking to expand the platforms. In March 25, we announced an MOU we signed with the Dominican government to expand the Itabo coal plant, 300 megawatts. That\'s already been announced. We\'re looking at expanded storage. But one of the things that Andr\xc3\xa9s had mentioned earlier, we do everything -- all platforms with partners. So if we\'re going to grow in the DR, we are going to balance the risk and reward by making sure that we build a bigger and better business with partners who can help manage the risk. So that\'s really what I wanted to say there. And I probably didn\'t change the slide, but you followed me anyway, and you can read it later because I don\'t like to be fast. So I\'m trying to be fast.
Let\'s go onto EMEA. A little bit different. These are more stand-alone businesses. And the one I really want to talk about is Maritza in Bulgaria because it is a big producer of us, and there\'s been a lot of news on Bulgaria. But if you look at this very quickly, you see the floating blue country, and that\'s another geography test. That\'s Kazakhstan. Those who have followed us for a while know that we have -- we\'ve done quite well there, specifically when we sold our coal mine and plant complex called Ekibastuz a number of years ago. So in total, we think that we\'ve -- so there\'s a lot of value out of Kazakhstan. What\'s remaining there for us is to combine heat and power plants, probably totaling, in terms of power rating, about 600 megawatts and 2 hydro concessions, all located in eastern Kazakhstan. This does produce about $70 million a year in earning PTC -- adjusted PTC for us, and we\'ll continue to do that. The one thing that has happened is that the -- there\'s been a new energy law, which basically said that, "From 2013 through 2015, all net income must be reinvested in an improvement investment program in these plants." So we\'re not going to get any cash out. And actually, it was very good that we were able to maintain our earnings by finding enough good capital investments to make. So when we come out of this period, which we expect, we will then be able to dividend out all our net income and have a much stronger businesses, but we don\'t have any plans for any expansion or growth in Kazakhstan. This is one of the issues where we do have to ask the question, whether this remains the strategic -- if this is a strategic business for AES.
Now broadly, you see Turkey up there. Turkey is not material at this point. It\'s still an issue of -- we have to take decisions on that. Andr\xc3\xa9s may talk about that, and you may ask him a question later about how we think about Turkey.  Right now, there\'s a -- it\'s more development pipeline and activities without partner, but it\'s not really producing anything material in terms of earnings.
In the U.K., specifically Northern Ireland, we have Ballylumford and Kilroot. Collectively, they are producing good earnings. So we\'ve got -- probably [indiscernible] on each plant is producing about $50 million. In 2012, we expect Ballylumford to step down based from its contract, but Kilroot will continue to produce at the level of about $40 million, $45 million in PTC going forward.
Sub-Saharan Africa, that\'s AES SONEL, which is integrated utility and a 300-megawatt barge project in Nigeria. And we\'re not going to tell much more about that.
So let\'s sort of get onto Maritza. The news -- energy has been a big issue in politics in Bulgaria. The former government fell mostly on civil protests about energy prices. There will be a new election on May 12. Now that the heating season is over, you\'ll hear very little about energy prices. And as you do know, there was a lot of concern and discussion around the distribution licenses held by the -- by Chaz [ph]. We have had a plan of full engagement in terms of stakeholder management. When we think about Maritza, we have built -- and Maritza is the most efficient plant in Bulgaria, burning a domestic fuel, lignite. It meets all the EU directives for environmental compliance for 2016. So what is the best piece of capacity that Bulgaria has? Our PPA, which is slightly higher than the average PPAs, reflects not only the price of the plant, but the state-of-the-art waste disposal facility, and the waste that we\'re disposing is lignite ash.
So this is a very modern plant, and it represents the most significant FD, foreign direct, investment in Bulgaria. Our view -- and we\'ve learned the hard way that your best protection in any market is having a quality low-cost asset. All our engagements so far is that we believe that our PPA is sound, that the new government will recognize that they have some structural reforms in the sectors and, actually, the World Bank, under EU direction -- with the EU is working on -- looking at the distribution and transportation network in the country. Our initial conversations, nobody has raised the issue of PPAs and we still believe that they will basically respect the contracts that they have. They have -- there are 2 PPAs for generation in Bulgaria, both with American companies. So you can believe that we\'ve been very much in touch with not only the state department, but with our representative to the EU plus the fact that our major lender is the ERBD (sic) [EBRD] and our lenders are also involved in this. So we feel relatively comfortable that we will survive the political noise. But I have to be honest, we have to be engaged, which we are, and this is something that we will keep you informed about.
But again, it\'s an extremely valuable asset to the Bulgarians, and they need growth and they need foreign investments. So we basically view their attempt to look at our PPA in a way not to support to it, as they -- it\'s not something that we expect. So we\'ll, as I said, keep you informed.
Just covering the last SBU, which is Asia. When we talk about Asia, much more focused, much more disciplined. Philippines, we\'ll talk about Masinloc, which is the plant that we acquired from the government and turned it around. We\'ll talk a little bit more about that.
But just to talk about really the 2 other things that with -- in Asia, one is the construction of the Mong Duong coal plant in Vietnam. We will talk a little bit more about that going forward. But 1,250-megawatt supercritical unit using local anthracite coal.  It\'s an excellent project. It is a BOT project, so it has lease accounting. So it has high cash on cash returns early on.
And the other is India, where we used to have a relatively broad focus. But to be honest, right now, we\'re focused in a very narrow way and only in 1 state and only on 1 platform. That\'s the Odisha power generating company, and I will talk more about that.
We have Kelanitissa, which is in the little teardrop off of India, which is Sri Lanka, which is about 170-megawatt combined cycle plant, runs on diesel. The PPA expires. And fundamentally, they will not be contributed going forward.
So let\'s just talk about Masinloc. And I want to use this as an example of everything we\'ve talked about. Platform growth. We acquired this plant, and we turned it around. We saw the availability increased from 74% to some 94%. We\'ve also improved the efficiency of this coal plant from a heat rate north of 12,000 to just under 10,000. That\'s very important because that\'s efficiency. So when we talk about efficiency, it\'s an availability that reduces to money. So we improved the operations, but we\'ve also improved the commercial relationship. We\'ve basically expanded our contract with Meralco from 75% of the capacity to 85% of the capacity, taking out some volatility.
But the other thing we did to enable us to actually grow is that our original multi-lateral lenders really liked us to buy the coal plant and get it efficient, but they weren\'t terribly keen on having us expand. So what we actually did is we went out and refinanced with local banks. So to the degree if we want to expand, we could. We got lower cost of money and average tender was longer in time. We\'ll talk more about this. But the combination of redoing the commercial relationship and the financing gives us more debt capacity for growth. So what we\'ve actually done is we built a very interesting platform that we have the option to grow on.
So this is the sort of the growth picture, and I always talk to our IR people because I tell them I really don\'t like this stick-figured power plants. I\'m an engineer, and I just don\'t think it reflects reality. But in this case it actually does. That is exactly the site where we will expand, and we do have the option to take up to 300 to 600 megawatts there. Same equipment, typical platform expansion for us. We\'ll try to use everything the same, so we minimized our cost, having the same equipment, the same turbines and everything else. So this is an option that we\'re doing-- and we would want this to be fully contracted. So we\'re actually in discussion with a number of offtakers now. This is -- it\'s going to be a contracted plant. We\'re in the stages to do that. The coal for this for anything [ph] comes from Indonesia. So it\'s Indonesian coal, which is relatively well priced for us now. So you may be hearing more about Masinloc. When we talk about Philippines, this is what we\'re talking about.
Moving forward, Odisha. We currently have about 460 megawatts of -- in the original plant, which is that sort of brick building you see in the foreground. It\'s been there for a while. We\'re 49% owner. So the majority owner -- or the majority partner is the state of Odisha, which is very helpful to us because we get treated as a state enterprise. A lot of advantages to that, one being that the commercialization of the energy from this plant and any forward-going project goes right to the state through what they call the national grid operator in the state. And Odisha has a policy of actually using its energy as an export currency from the state to surrounding states, which are also in dire need of energy. For those who know the Indian market, solid energy and infrastructure projects are hard to develop. And when you have them and are done right, they\'re very valuable.
The state of Odisha is known for its cleanliness of government and its integrity. As such, it\'s one of the only states that has preserved its allocation of coal blocks. It has 2 coal blocks that have been dedicated to the expansion of this project. Those 2 coal blocks alone could support up to another 2,400 megawatts of development, and we\'re talking about 1,300 megawatts. We also understand that a third coal block has been offered. Now remember, this is the coal region of India. You kick the dirt, and there is coal to be found. But the fact that you have these coal blocks to allocate is very important because there was a relatively large scandal in India with coal block allocations in flipping those without building infrastructure projects. It\'s known as Coalgate. This is the 1 survivor of Coalgate that still remains and has their coal blocks. So it\'s a very interesting project for us. We -- it\'s not just a power plant. We call it as the complex, it\'s the project, it\'s the railroad -- 40-kilometer railroad to the coal and the coal mine development.
AES has been asked by its partners to take responsibility for project management and development of the whole project. So even though we\'re a 49% partner, we supply the managing and operational directive for the existing facility. We have operational responsibilities for the expansion, and we have the construction and development of all those aspects as part of our responsibility. We\'re actually quite excited about this.
Going on. This is Mong Duong. Put it up there. A $1.9 billion investment in supercritical anthracite plant. We have partners. We have 51% of the equity in the project, about 30% is POSCO, which is the large Korean conglomerate in steel and engineering construction and power business; and 19% is with the China Investment Corporation.
This project is setting all kinds of safety records, which I said is a mark of quality. In fact, we\'ve been asked to help other projects to do this. I think we\'re developing a very strong brand in Vietnam. I think Vietnam is a market that we\'re going to take a look at because we\'re seeing some very interesting growth as it\'s becoming an outlet for Chinese manufacturing -- and as costs of labor increase in China. So Vietnam is in a very interesting position.
Lastly, just to make them complete, these are projects within these 3 SBUs that are currently under construction. Kribi, which is an internal combustion gas project in Cameroon, 100% offtake by AES SONEL. It\'s in liability testing now. It should be COD June of this year.
Below, you see the 36 megawatts of wind. These are 2 projects, Sixpenny Wood and Yelvertoft. What\'s critical about this is that they should be commercial in June. Sixpenny would have some delays in towers. But what\'s critical is they have to start evacuating power in order to get the renewable credit.  Both have already met that requirement. So we have what we need, and these projects will come along this year. And then, you see this 247-megawatt heavy fuel oil-fired paker [ph] plant in Jordan. This is a platform extension as well, and it\'s off our Amman East project, same PPA, same partners, same offtakers, project that has gotten us a lot of good stakeholder management activities and actually is a relatively attractive project in and of itself.
So let me finish there and give you my wrap-up from everything you heard. One is if you think about us from an operation perspective, think about us disciplined and focused. We had -- everything we do is by process. All our businesses do things the same way.  It allows us to have efficient communications. And the time of freelancing and everybody doing their own thing at AES doesn\'t exist anymore. So the discipline and focus and the way you think about the management team and the team you\'ve seen, I think you can see some of that discipline and focus in just the way they think about their businesses. Our SBUs are collections of businesses. The main responsibility of the SBU President, in addition to the P&L responsibility, is to constantly look for efficiencies between the businesses they run, whether that it\'s in Brazil or whether that\'s in Europe, Middle East and Africa.
One of my major responsibilities is to make sure that we get synergies between these businesses. So this is constant search for efficiencies based on practices, organization and what we do. Everybody is driven to get full value out of the platform. When we think about full value, we know that there\'s an operational value. We know that there is an adjacent business value, which we\'ve talked about. We also know that there\'s value in property rights, whether these are air permits, or PPAs. So we constantly try to think of all of these buckets, how we can leverage the value that is present because it\'s multidimensional, it\'s not just operational.
And lastly, and I\'ll say it again, almost everything we do, the fabric of what we do has to have the sense of superb stakeholder engagement. We have learned that the way to be successful, even in the most difficult markets, within the most difficult political situations or the most difficult local situations, is through superb stakeholder engagement. And I have a group that reports directly to me that manages this and works with all our businesses to make sure we have consistent practices.
So that concludes it for me, and I think what we\'ll do now is bring up Britaldo, Felipe, Ken and myself will sit there, and we\'ll prepare. We will be spending 20 to 30 minutes answering your questions, plus we will be with you at lunch as well to do the same. And I think Ahmed may act as the facilitator.
Ahmed Pasha
Sure. Thank you, guys. If you can please mention your complete name and name of your company, that would be helpful, because it\'s being webcast. And we would like to finish this Q&A session by about 10:40, then we\'re going to have a 10-minutes break.
Ahmed Pasha
Ali?
Ali Agha - SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc., Research Division
Sure. Question on the Brazil business. Can you -- I know you alluded to, in one of your slides, the fact that you are having discussions to potentially go back on the Eletropaulo tariff reset and you expect a decision in July. Can you give us some insight into what you\'re asking for and, best case scenario, if you get what you\'re asking for, what that means to the PTC of that business? Would that be recorded ongoing in \'13, or will that be a one-time gain? And secondly, also on Brazil, I see the growth numbers you put up there, which are attractive, but then I see the regulatory hurdles that you put up there as well, and the push by the government to lower prices and the challenges you face with contracts expiration and what-have-you. If that continues and the current president is reelected, what is the long-term viability for Brazil for AES to work under such a regime for another, let\'s say, 5 years with this kind of regulatory issues?
Felipe Ceron
Well, first, the -- with the tariff reset that you did -- you referred, what we\'re asking for -- we had certain assets we moved from our asset base off the 2003 tariff cycle -- off the 2003 tariff reset. So we are asking the regulator to be considered [indiscernible] on the concept of the prior asset bases of the visual [ph] tariff reset. They have been shooted by the regulator himself, and that\'s one of the requests. The value of the assets in that discussion totals BRL 1.2 billion, more or less $600 million. And in addition to that, in the incremental regulatory investments that we have done in the 2007, 2011 cycles, we got recognized approximately BRL 1.2 billion instead of BRL 1.6 billion, almost BRL 1.7 billion, that we have done. So there is this BRL 400 million to BRL 500 million under discussion also to be reconsidered in the incremental asset base that was built between 2007 and 2011. What\'s that may mean with regard to PTC?  I think we have to wait for the discussions that we\'re having. And I don\'t think we are in a position to make an estimate today because this is a process that is going to go until the end of June. And even for strategic reasons, I wouldn\'t comment on that at this time, okay? But that\'s what we\'re discussing. Basically what we\'re saying is if we get those things recognized, we would get -- you would get the weighted average cost of capital applied to that. So the degree of success will depend on the arguments that we\'re presenting to the regulator and how this whole discussions is going to develop at the end of June because the exact date is July 4, 2013, when we have to apply the new tariffs. It wouldn\'t be a one-time gain because, in fact, you may have different effects reflecting in \'14 and \'15 because the next tariff reset is July 15, and some of the effects may go back to July 2011. Remember that the reset was delayed for a year, even the whole discussions of the tariff reset methodology between the regulator and the distribution companies, in general, in Brazil, okay? The second part?
Ahmed Pasha
Is regarding Brazil.
Felipe Ceron
Yes. Well, on the regulatory front, we would view that the -- I\'d say the regulatory environment has changed in a significant manner since, let\'s say, December 2012 and with the third tariff reset. What we see in the distribution business is reduced margins that we\'re seeing that on our EBITDA levels. That, of course, brings the challenge of more efficiency. That\'s the signal that is in the tariff reset, together with the quality of services -- of increasing quality of services requirements. But as we look at what we have done in terms of cost management and the efficience project, I see room for us to improve the performance of the business. And if you look at Sul, Sul has had a tariff reset that has been slightly negative in 2013. But overall, in the [indiscernible] 2018, it\'s a net positive. If I give you -- if I could give you a range of what\'s the upside that we see that we got is we estimate in approximately $36 million of upside in the entire cycle for Sul. So I think we had specific issues in Eletropaulo to address with the regulator. But we have to see the distribution business as a -- compared to the prior cycles, at lower margins for sure, and that will -- the success here will be efficiency and how much technology and automation that we can put on our business to increase the returns.
Unknown Attendee
[indiscernible]
Britaldo Pedrosa Soares
Okay. On Sul, the first day, the way the tariff works in Brazil, you -- the first year just after a tariff reset, usually you see PTC decreasing, okay? Because you removed the efficiencies and passed through to the tariffs, okay? So if you ask me if the liquidity of Sul is the same size of 2012, the answer is no because this is the first year of the tariff -- of the new tariff cycle, so it\'s going to increase. What we see looking forward until 2018 is no regulatory overhang, the divestment plans being executed, asset base increasing for the next reset and the efficiency and the improvement of the quality of services in Sul, okay? So I would say Sul will be recovering at the level of PTC over time along this cycle until 2018, okay? is that clear? Okay. With regard to Uruguaiana, which is the combined cycle plant in the south, we have 2 things to consider. One is put it back to long term service. That would imply a continuous contribution to PTC, not only 2013. It will depend upon the final terms of the negotiation. But we have an authorization -- a regulatory authorization to operate the plant until June 2027, and that\'s what we\'re targeting more or less, I mean, to get to up -- up to that limit, okay? And the only thing that would be a onetime in this case is -- if we\'re successful resolving it in 2013 is the arbitration -- is the outcome of the arbitration with YTF or any kind of negotiation we may have in the scope of the broader -- let\'s say, the broader -- a negotiation by putting the plant back to operation and discussing the arbitration process.
Ahmed Pasha
Brian [ph]?
Unknown Attendee
[indiscernible]
Kenneth J. Zagzebski
I think just to start with the case, it\'s -- so as we take a look at strategy, obviously, try to maximize return over time, and I think there\'s a number of factors that go into it. It\'s -- by and large, it\'s going to be the new capacity that\'s going to be the primary driver behind any type of case. So it depends on when we can get -- what type of recovery we can get for capacity. We\'ll have a gap year [indiscernible] to wait the environmental regulations are now as we\'ll have to -- it appears we\'ll have to shut down the Eagle Valley plant and the smaller units in April 2016. The CCGT we\'re looking at constructing or proposed, not constructing, will be in service in 2017. So one of the factors will be recovering that capacity in that gap year. And then with the CCGT, then we\'ll look to recover those costs, obviously through a rate case. I think the future test year is something that, if you take a look at the overall strategy, the future test year is something that we\'re looking at now and the impact on that and timing the new investments that we talked about today, and how to best get those into rates. So I think the strategy, there\'s a couple of things. And one is our current cost structure in taking a look at the capacity, the gap year and take a look at overall the new investments that we have.
Ahmed Pasha
Okay. Any other question? No? Maybe we can have a 15-minutes break. So we will reconvene after 15 minutes.
[Break]
Ahmed Pasha
Okay. We\'re going to get started. Let me invite Annmarie Reynolds, who is the Vice President and Chief Risk Officer. Many of you may not have met her before, but she is an important part of our senior management team. She\'s going to talk about our risk management strategy.
Annmarie Reynolds
Thank you, Ahmed. Good morning. It\'s a pleasure to be here today to talk to you all about our risk management approach and strategies. I\'m going to be repeating a lot of what you\'ve heard today from our SBU leaders because our business model is designed to reduce market risks. And from a commodity perspective, we engage in medium- to long-term contracts to minimize our exposure to power price volatility. Those contracts generally include direct or indexation days fuel and variable cost pass-throughs. From a currency perspective, we match our revenues and expenses and in many cases, we\'re able to denominate back to U.S. dollars the material agreements of our businesses.
Exception to this include our operations in Brazil, where there is no local currency risk. It\'s entirely in reais, whereas the U.S. parent, we have exposure and, similarly in Bulgaria, where there is no exposure locally. It\'s entirely euro. But we, as the U.S. parent that have that euro/USD exposure. Our contracting strategy and structure is designed to minimize our risk to hydrology or dispatch exposure. We heard Britaldo speak earlier about Tiet\xc3\xaa and our contracting around assured energy. While we use different terminology in different markets, the assured energy is not an average hydrology, but it is a level that we have a high degree of confidence that, under most scenarios, will be able to deliver given normal hydrological variations. And as you know, we have a nonrecourse project finance model, and that\'s a testament to the well-structured risk mitigants that are within our businesses. And with that model, we have very low interest rate exposure with 85% to 90% fixed.
Proactively managing the remaining risks, so counter-party credit. We\'re engaging with those contracts with high-quality, lender-approved offtakers. And in our businesses where we have a portfolio of contracting strategy, not only do we have those high-quality counter-parties, but we also benefit from the diversification and the diversification from a recontracting perspective as well.
Again, we have leverage, which is a risk mitigant as the parent, but again is a testament to the well-structured risk mitigation that\'s happening at the business level right upfront. From a regulatory risk perspective, many of our agreements include contractual pass-throughs or sharing of regulatory exposure, and you heard a lot this morning about our stakeholder engagement at the local level.
Similarly, on the operational risk side, we have many important contractual operational risk pass-throughs in risk sharing, and we\'re engaged on a local level in operational risk management. What we\'re less than with is some residual commodity and currency exposure, and we\'re proactively designing hedge strategies around that on our commodities, on multi-year basis and currencies on a 12-month rolling average basis. And they\'re designed to result in an aggregate portfolio exposure that\'s consistent with our risk appetite and designed to deliver on meeting our commitments. 80% of our businesses are contracted for utility. You\'ve heard this throughout the discussion this morning.
Looking at our 2013 adjusted PTC, we\'ve broke this down for you, where 17% is projected to come from utilities. We have a contracted bucket we described in our 10-K, that represents about 2/3 of our 2013 PTC. We\'ve segmented this further to help you into what we consider a long term, which is in excess of 5 years and, in some cases, up to 25 years in term, and medium term, which is 2 to 5 years. And the last 17% comes from what we call our short-term sales businesses. And I just want to be clear that these short-term sales businesses are not entirely spot market transactions. There is hedging activity going on, but these are businesses where the hedging activity is primarily less than 2 years.
The average term in the contracting bucket, that 2/3 of long-term and medium-term, has an average remaining life of 7 years.  If we look into where we\'re operating these different segments of business throughout our SBUs, you can see our utility operations are primarily in the U.S., where we operate DPL and IPL. And I want to point out that consistent with our SEC filings, all of DPL is within the utility bucket in the U.S. SBU, also in Brazil, where we operate Sul and Eletropaulo, and then smaller operations in El Salvador, which you\'ve heard about this morning and also now in our EMEA in Cameroon operations.
The contracted bucket, long and medium term, is throughout our SBUs, and that\'s really a staple of AES business model. But Asia, I will point out, is entirely a long-term contracted model. You\'ve heard about Masinloc in the Philippines, OPGC in India and, once online, our Mong Duong facility in Vietnam.
The short-term sales operations are primarily in our Andes SBU, where in Colombia and Argentina they are not long-term contracting opportunities. You\'ve heard about our Colombia operations, Chivor. We are hedging 1- to 4-year term, although the bulk of the hedging activity and the highest degree of hedge is in the first 2 years, where we\'re 85% hedged in the current year. We have successfully recontracted that business over time, and we\'re confident that we\'ll be able to continue to engage in contracting at comparable levels.
And in Argentina, you\'ve heard as well about the regulatory changes and our engagements with the Argentine government and the key stakeholders there to ensure that we continue to be compensated with the critical value-add that our assets bring to that market, particularly at San Nicolas, the only coal facility in the country.
One of the things I\'ll mention about our Andes markets is they\'re -- in Colombia and in Chile, they\'re very stable strong capacity markets. They\'re quite different than the market you might be familiar with here in the U.S. that have steep demand curves. We don\'t see that same deregulated market without that same steepness to the demand curve. And so, we benefit from that, both in Chile and in Colombia -- and Colombia, where we have the short-term sales operation.
The other short-term sales that you\'ve heard about are in Brazil at the Uruguaiana facility and EMEA at our Kilroot facility in Northern Ireland. And I\'ll point out that the Kilroot facility in Northern Ireland has a similar capacity market. It does not have that same steep demand curves that we\'re familiar with in the U.S., and we benefit from that and it gives us -- creates an important opportunity for us to benefit from widening spreads, but to have a stable cash flow to support the business.
So from our proactively designed portfolio integrated strategies, you can see the results that our commodity sensitivity is quite low in 2013. On a 10% correlated exposure for the full year, that\'s just $0.03, and a year ago it\'s $0.02. The coal and gas sensitivity is primarily from Kilroot in Northern Ireland because we\'re highly hedged in 2013 in the U.S., particularly in DPL. Our oil sensitivity is low and it\'s primarily from spot market sales, where our margins are sensitive to changes in oil price in Andes, MCAC, EMEA and Asia.
Looking forward to 2015, our sensitivities grow, as you would expect in a multi-year strategy. When taking a longer-term view, there is growth in our exposure. And the addition here is primarily related to DPL and is levered through the PJM dark spread improvement. Considering the asymmetry of that risk and the greater upside potential then downside potential, we\'re comfortable with that level of exposure in 2015, particularly with the continued low natural gas prices in the U.S. But we\'re positioned to make active decisions about how much of that risk we keep on and take off the table as spreads widen or contract. And I will make mention that we have some offsetting gas exposure to the U.S. natural gas exposure from our Henry Hub linked pricing at our LNG supply contract in the Dominican Republic.
Looking into foreign exchange, you\'ll see how the structure of our businesses has mitigated our foreign exchange risks as well as our on top [ph] active hedging. So while only about 1/5 of our PTC is coming from our operations in the U.S.  You could see more than half of our PTC is USD or USD equivalent.  That\'s because, in some places, we\'re operating in USD-based economies, like Panama. But in other cases, because of the structuring of our businesses and our PPAs, like in Chile and in Masinloc, the remaining 45% of the exposure is primarily euro and pound, Brazilian reais, Colombian peso, Argentine peso and to a much lesser extent, from Chilean peso exposure. We, again, then aggregate and manage that risk on a 12-month rolling basis, so proactively layering on hedges. And you can see the correlated 10% full year move to FX sensitivity after hedging activity is just $0.045. Without the hedging activity, it would be $0.065. On a year-to-go basis, it\'s just $0.03 on exposure.
So wrapping up, key risk management takeaways. Our business model helps reduce risk and is designed to mitigate our exposure. 80% of our 2013 through 2015 variable margin is insulated from commodity risk through contracts or regulatory mechanisms. Our 2013 commodity exposure is low. It\'s asymmetric. We have more upside than downside because of the dispatch capabilities of our plants and our position.  We\'re long on natural gas in the medium to long term, and a 10% correlated move in all exposed commodities is less than a 3% impact to our EPS. FX exposure is also limited by our contract structure and operations in USD-based economies as well as then our on top [ph] 12-month hedging program. AES directionally benefits from a weakening dollar, and a 10% correlated move in our basket of currencies is less than 5% of 2013 EPS.
And with that, I will hand it off to Tom O\'Flynn, our CFO.
Thomas M. O\'Flynn
Okay. Thanks, Annmarie, and thanks, everybody, for coming. Hopefully, you\'ll got a good chance to listen to the depth of our team, dive deeper into the businesses a little more, get a chance to get a sense of the people who are helping us drive the business and drive the results.
What I\'d like to do is then try to roll some of these up on our financials, where we are, where we\'re going, what it means from an earnings, PTC, cash flow, capital allocation standpoint.
I will say that there\'s more information -- the books are here. Federal Express had a few excuses; we won\'t try to pick [ph] that up which one is right, but anyway. There\'s a good information in the books, good information in the appendix as well. But don\'t worry, we\'re not going to go through the appendix. But just if you look back a couple of pages that we\'ve been using now since the year end call, I think they\'re 108 and 109, all of our -- we have 5 public filers, 2 in Brazil under Britaldo; and there\'s obviously a public filer, the public equity and public debt. We also -- Ken has 2 public filers whose debt [ph] only in Dayton and Indianapolis. All those folks report ahead of us, and we\'re now -- at the end of the year, we started reporting those numbers piece by piece, both IFRS and GAAP.  You can roll them up and you can see, for example, of our 3 publicly-traded Lat Am unsubs, we have market cap of about 5.3 billion, which is a good -- which is, obviously, a big chunk of our value. We also have -- just so you know, we also have a bunch of 10-Ks out front. We did -- as we try to work simple and talk simple, we did do a lot of work on our 10-K, so if you look at the first 50 pages or so of our 10-K. It does go through in a systematic fashion. Each of our SBUs and the major businesses within SBUs, business market, regulation, financial drivers, so once again, trying to help folks out. So what I want to do here then is talk about PTC and EPS in gradually increasing timeframes.  So the quarter, the year and then \'12 to \'15. I want to talk about proportional free cash flow, important for a number of reasons, including the dividend and dividend policy that Andr\xc3\xa9s has talked about, which gets us in the capital allocation and then finish with some takeaways.
So as I said, I do need the books. Unlike Andy, they can work with pictures, I need the books to help with numbers. This is consistent with our release here. As you can see, EPS Q1 $0.26 versus $0.37 last year.  Both are consistent with the prerelease that we put out about a week or so ago before we did our debt deal that I will touch on where I think I said -- we said it would be $0.25 to $0.27. Of the decrease, about half of it is the absence of Cartagena, one-time arbitration settlement we had last year and then about $0.03 is due to hydrology that I\'ll touch on, also about hydrology impacting us both in Brazil and also in Panama.
I\'m not sure if Ken mentioned, but we did have the positive impact in the U.S. of the Beaver Valley PPA termination. Beaver Valley is a very old small coal plant, had a PPA through 16 with a PJM utility. We\'re operating -- marginal cost was above the market, obviously below our PPA price. It\'s a win-win for us to terminate that PPA that was done in January. We got a cash payment. That\'s the major diff in Q1 \'13 versus Q1 \'12. Essentially, what that is doing is bringing earnings into the first quarter that we otherwise would have -- had earned over our \'12 through \'15 time period.
So from overall total return \'12 through \'15 profile, just moving money around.  It does help us in this quarter. I think Felipe touched on Andes down somewhat from last year due to lower gas availability in Chile. Britaldo touched on Brazil, the hydrology issues they went through in good detail and also slightly lower demand in Sul. We got hit by, I guess, rainfall in 2 ways where we -- in the North, where we have hydro, it didn\'t rain enough. And in the south, where we have distribution of rain too much, and then so our irrigation load was down. So it\'s good we have a large portfolio across the globe, but sometimes we get hit coming and going in small places. Lower hydrology that Andy mentioned in Panama with Changuinola. I think our bottom line hydrology, if you think about Latin America, it impacted us negatively about $0.03. And just to equate, about $0.01 is about 10 to 11 PTC, just think about shares outstanding and about 30% tax rate. So 10 to 11 PTC is a $0.01. We said our impact -- or the $0.26 was impacted by about $0.03 of hydrology in Lat Am and Central America. As we sit here today, we think the numbers could even be probably about double for the year. So call it about $0.06 is our expectation. That being said, we are very comfortable with our guidance. We\'ve got some other offsets, but that\'s just giving you a little more color in how rainfalls are impacting us. I think the other pieces have been talked about. EMEA and Asia is pretty flat. So as you can see, the quarter is laid out here.
Proportional free cash flow is the strong Q1, up about 50% from $230 million to about $350 million, but 1/3 of that number was the Beaver Valley number that I talked about. The other pieces were some lower working capital in the DR and then some other pieces. But the $350 million is, obviously, a very good start, especially when you think about our guidance is $750 million to $1,050 million, so a $350 million relative to the midpoint of that, the $900 million is quite a good start to the quarter. I\'ll touch more on cash flow, where it comes from, where it goes in a few slides here.
So at the end of the year, we talked -- we started talking about SBUs. We talked about SBU PTC profitability, added it up, consistent with how we are in the first quarter. We talked about directionally where we thought the SBUs would go for the year and anticipating the next question -- well, the direction is fine, but give me a number. We provided some indications of PTC ranges for the year by SBU.
Once again, our focus here is on the guidance number, $1.24 to $1.32, which drives that from a PTC standpoint at the number at the bottom, which is $1.93 million to $2.135 million.  Nevertheless, we though it has helpful to provide some ranges of how we get from here to there. These are consistent generally with what you saw from each of the SBU presidents, where they had -- I think Ken had minus 5 to 15, Britaldo had a range and Felipe also had a range. But the U.S., generally, we see -- will be down. DPL is down. South is still working very well, but it had a quite a good year last year with the Huntington Beach restart to compensate for songs [ph] and then, there are some planned outages at IPL. Andes, I think Felipe went on, it\'s growing, continues to grow.  New plants, contracts aligned better availability. Brazil, be about equal. Sul came down consistent with our expectations. But at the same time, the Eletropaulo will be better than last year. MCAC, modest positive. We had a very constructive rate reset at the end of the year, just before New Year\'s in El Salvador, modest business, but constructive rate reset and the DR margin continues to move forward.
EMEA is down, once again, with the absence of Cartagena. In Asia, solid business. Masinloc is very, very well last year. It had some length, market was quite strong, 1 or 2 plants were out, so the market popped up, we took advantage of it. We have a more conservative approach going forward. Actually, for the next 7 years, we\'re largely contracted, which means we expect revenues to be down somewhat -- margins to be down somewhat, but much more predictable.
So on the next page, I think we\'ve said this, we are reaffirming our guidance EPS, proportional free cash flow and then the other one that we don\'t talk about as much, consolidated net cash, which is our GAAP reconciliation. You can see the ways to get there at the bottom, especially the 1.9 to 2.1 PTC that I just talked about. The commodity in foreign currencies are as of March 31.  Those have helped up us, given us a little bit of tailwind, especially the dark spread in date and dated dark spread a little bit in Kilroot.  Maybe that makes up for about half the hydrology, so call it 3 senses, as we sit here, but it\'s not as much first quarter. It\'s more over the course of the year, but that\'s given us a little bit of tailwind.
When you think about -- let\'s talk about \'12 to \'15. So we\'ve talked before about our growth drivers. You can see on the right. Then on the \'12 to \'15, the folks, the SBUs with positive trends are really consistent with the \'12 to \'15, or I\'m sorry, \'12 to \'13 themes we just covered. By Andes strongest growth, Brazil especially, as both Eletropaulo -- as Britaldo answered the question, both of our discos have now been through the rate resets so you\'d expect to mangrove, it\'s deficiencies to really be kicking in over the next few years. Hydro Tiete is flat from a contract perspective, so we\'d expect Brazil to have some growth and MCAC, also some modest growth.
Flat to decline in U.S. really for the same reasons, some continued pressure at DPL, modest growth at IPL with MATS. The rest of the 6,000 fleet of IPP is being more stable. And then EMEA and Asia, Asia will be growth, and again, we went through that. Our large Vietnamese plant, Mong Duong doesn\'t start until late \'15. We\'ll be a modest earnings producer and very strong cash producer, starting Q4 \'15 and thereafter.
But you could see the components of growth of SBU growth cost-cutting, capital allocation, offset by some asset sales, dividend yields that will get us some of the 6% to 8%. I think, as Andres has said many times, I think 6% to 8% total return is what we see in front of us. That being said, he\'s challenging us all the time to look for ways to bring that up in the 8% to 10% range. Obviously, those aren\'t things I want to talk about until we\'re comfortable. This has got me on the bones to do so.
Here\'s the detailed chart that I will need to book for. But this is really little more color on how we get from \'12 to \'15, how the SBUs are going to grow, and what the segments are. And as I said, many of these are consistent with what we talked about in \'12 to \'13. Once you get in the first column, it shows whether we think these SBUs will be positive, negative or neutral. You can see the U.S. quite consistent DPL. And this is \'12 to \'15, so this includes obviously \'12 to \'13, as well as \'13 to \'15. But you could see DPL, some wind earnings, and as Ken said, we don\'t expect to be building many new wind turbines. But to some complicated partnership structures, we are into a better earnings profile period of those facilities. Andes will have higher availability as well the plant, Ventanas IV and Tunjita. Felipe mentioned Brazil, demand growth which is -- are discos. MCAC, I think I\'ve covered these, and then EMEA, Andy talked briefly about Kazakhstan. Lower facility -- a new facility, I\'m sorry, in Cameroon and then Asia, once again, I covered that from \'12 to \'13 on the prior page. We do have some new facilities in EMEA that Andy also touched on. And then, really, a theme throughout this. We talked about cost-cutting and have numbers really at the G&A level, the G&A level that Andres walked through.  The 145 in 2014 is primarily Arlington, with a little bit of G&A, within the SBUs, but as we go along -- as we continue to work deeper, there\'s also some numbers at the businesses and we also really look to work for ways to make ourselves more efficient.
But now I\'d like to talk about cash flow. We talked about a little about capital allocation. I think before we can use it, we got to get it. So first, I want to talk about how we get cash. Proportional free cash flow is a guidance number. I showed that  first quarter, about $350 million on the second slide that I went through. So this is talking about where we were last year, where we expect to be this year on proportional free cash flow. The proportional cash from operations last year was about $1.9 billion.  That\'s cash flow from ops on the balance -- on the cash flow statement like any other company. For us, it\'s adjusted by a proportional ownership interest, so there\'s some businesses that we consolidate, don\'t own all of, some businesses that we don\'t consolidate, so that\'s a -- our percentage of cash flow from ops based upon a facility business we own.
We had CapEx of about $700 million last year, so that got us to a number $1.242 billion, that was a proportional free cash flow well within our guidance range for last year. This year, what we do expect? We talked about the number on the far right, the $750 million to $1,050,000,000, but let me step to the left of that right chunk and I\'ll come back to that. So similar number proportional cash from ops, we expect to be about $1,650,000,000 to $1,950,000,000. Our normalized -- we\'re calling our normalized CapEx, which is our proportional maintenance and environmental CapEx, is about $650 million, looks a lot like what it was last year. That gets you to about $1 billion to $1,300,000,000. Why are we only $750 million to $1,050,000,000? Well, because we\'ve got about $250 million of CapEx, about half is environmental CapEx at Gener and the other half is environmental CapEx at IPL. You could argue whether the environmental CapEx -- we put everything in the environmental CapEx category, whether it is effectively earning returns, like it does in the Indianapolis, or whether it doesn\'t earn a return, like it does in Chile. So maybe this a little more punitive, but that\'s the way to walk down to get to our proportional free cash flow.
If you didn\'t look at what does that mean to get to parent free cash flow, apologies that the proportional free cash flow and parent free cash flow sound a lot like. I had that question in September, I elected not to change the definitions. So we can keep working with them.
But if you look at the proportional free cash flow in 2012, once again, the \'12 on the left, within the businesses, before the money ever gets to the parent, we\'re paying down non-recourse debt every year. For some, it\'s project financing, so they have scheduled amounts. Some, it\'s larger amounts. There may be elective maturity just like you would have within any company. And that\'s about $500 million a year. It\'s a pretty consistent number.
There\'s tons that will retain cash in the business.  Some of that maybe working capital, but probably the biggest number on this $226 million number, you look here, is Gener retained more cash last year, which means they paid less dividends up.  Why did they retain cash feasibility? Because a lot of the money that Felipe and the team put into Cochrane was reserved last year. And that\'s a good -- that\'s a reasonable chunk to that $226 million. So that gives us to parent free cash flow, $521 million.  That\'s the number that we had last year when we talked about and I\'ll show you the slides that we used to talked about it. Where were we this year? We\'re about $1.15 billion. The reduction at the non-recourse level, well over 5 again, familiar number. And then we have our non-recurring environmental CapEx, that\'s the $175 million -- that\'s the same as the $250 million from the prior page.  We reduced it a little bit because IPL will actually finance part of that money through debt at IPL, consistent with their 45-55 capital structure. So that gets us to a parent free cash flow range of about $450 million. Once again, our guidance or our expectations as we\'ve talked to people about is $400 million to $500 million.  That\'s the number that we use as we talk about our dividend yield.
So kind of bottom line from these slides, you can see how we think our parent free cash flow, a number around the 500-ish make sense. In the prior page, if you think about how you manage our free cash flow, if you think about our parent free cash flow, which we appreciate is a little more complicated given our parts and our different types of consolidation, we think is about $1 billion to $1.3 billion. Those are 2 numbers that we focus on a lot as we manage cash for the company. Then what do we do with it? Just what we do with it last year. You could see the $521 million, once again with the yellow highlight.  That\'s for me, to remind me. It was along with asset sales money, we had a $1.4 billion, and this is how we allocated it. This is all new, so I\'ll skip over.
For this year, we think we\'ll be once again about $400 million to $500 million. $450 million is the number we\'ve used a minute ago. If you go to the left, we\'ve got $180 million of asset sales. Those are closed at this point. The last one that closed was Ukraine, closed a couple weeks ago. We said we\'ll do about $500 million this year. We still are working on that. Once again, those are things that we\'ll talk about when they\'re on they\'re cooked, when they\'re ready to come out of the kitchen, not while they\'re still in the kitchen. And we\'ve also said that such sales would reduce our EPS this year about $0.05, and we\'re still in that same area.
So you see, we got about $1 billion, $1.1 billion of total discretionary cash. And you see on the right how we\'re going to use it. This is consistent with what we talked about before. The debt paid, and I\'ll get to in a minute, was actually in the middle of a tender, if it\'s working quite well and that\'s largely -- we\'ll use up that $400 million. Current dividend, $120 million. Approved investments $170 million, it\'s about $200 million last year. So that\'s down perhaps $20 million or $30 million from the last time people have seen this slide. That still leaves us even without the incremental asset sales we talked about, about $200 million to $300 million of cash that has yet to be allocated, up to $330 million, which is the blue chunk at 3 o\'clock.
As we see it, there is no meaningful large chunky use for that, with the exception of a potential participation in their equity raise, as Gener continues to build, especially Alto Maipo. They\'ll need to look for other non-debt capital.  They may look to raise equity, no decisions that there maybe equity raise, could be as high as $250 million to $300 million. We own 70% of that business. If we were elect to participate that and maintain our pro rata ownership in Gener, then that could be, call it, $150 million to $200 million of that blue.  That will be a later -- that will be a decision later this year, both what Gener is going to do and then what we might do. Obviously, we also have the option for other uses, potential dividend increase, so that\'s more probably next year, to the extent, if it impacts cash. Allocation of the data growth and also we do continue to have $300 million authorized under our share repurchase program that we talked about on our yearend call.
So just briefly down on other capital structure considerations. The company\'s long had a very strong non-recourse debt philosophy. The majority of our debt -- probably by about 2/3 of our debt is at the subs, so even more, maybe 70% is at the subs closest to the business, and that\'s debt with currency.  That\'s the debt with the cash flows, amortizes naturally.  You can see we\'ve got manageable pieces here.  The dark are utilities, which are much more financeable, but the -- even the gen stuff, small amounts and we\'ve been doing this for years and are all very manageable.
Just other financings we\'ve done. I\'d like to take credit as the new CFO with this, but the answer is -- the real bottom line is AES has been very good at financing for a long time and continue to be. We did announce -- top left, we did announce about a week ago that we were going to tender for $800 million of bond, I\'ll show you the maturity profile that\'s \'14, \'15, \'16, \'17. As part of that, we were going to issue and we did issue a $500 million 10-year note at 4 7/8%, very attractive rate for us.
In conjunction with that $500 million, and about the $400 million from the debt usage life from -- at 9 o\'clock, as you remember, is the slide a couple ago, we\'ll effectively take the $500 million and our $400 million-ish, $375 million to $400 million and retire $800 million of bonds. It\'s -- the cost is greater than face because some of those bonds are quite high coupon, buying them back at a premium.  Nevertheless, it makes sense for us from an economic standpoint, especially also to push out some of our maturities.
The tender, we put out the release this morning. Tender was very well, as we\'ve always described, but the $800 million we got tender responses for $1.14 billion.  We\'re assessing and we\'ll make it a determination over the next few days of how we close it out. But, bottom line, good news.
Just some other financings we\'ve done, I\'ll touch on the bottom right there. El Salvador is just an example of how our standalone business has continued to be able to finance successfully, so they did a 10-year bond, $300 million at 7%. And then in DPL, in DP&L we\'ve talked about a lot, some of the fixed income folks that asked us about our DPL and DP&L bank financings, about $1 billion, we\'ve -- we\'re at the later stages of negotiating, getting commitments and pushing those to 2016, so it\'s -- actually gives 3 years of time to get into the team, and then you could see I think both the Philippines and Cochrane were touched on in the SBU discussion.
Recourse debt, we continue to bring it down. You can see on the left, the $5.7 billion does pro forma for the tender that we\'ve done. And then you could see on the right, our maturity profile at the AF level is very attractive. The shaded areas are still in play, based upon what we do with the tenders, but we expect to bring each of those amounts down. But you can see very, very modest manageable maturities \'14, \'15 and \'16.
Credits stats. We continue to make progress on credits stats. We said we want to be solid BB. You can see debt comes down, cash flow goes up, we\'re making improvements and the math is below.
Dividend policy. Andres touched on this, but clearly we wanted to have our dividend tied to parent free cash flow. The $0.04 a quarter, about $120 million annually represents about 23% of parent free cash flow for \'12 and about 27% for this year, based on the middle of that range. I would want to get to that payout ratio by 2015. And we will, as Andres said, we will review this in the fourth quarter, really just we want to do it as we\'re going through our annual forecasting, to be comfortable that as we\'re assessing potential increases, we\'re comfortable with that sustainable free cash flow -- sustainable parent free cash flow.
So key takeaways. We are trying to improve transparency, we\'ve had suggestions, additional suggestions welcome. Continuing our balance approach to capital allocation. We\'re working hard to increase capital availability to support capital allocation. Reaffirming guidance. And we continue to think our stock represents an attractive value, our P/E of about 11. If you look at \'12 or \'13, it\'s low relative to a lot of our peers. Actually, one interesting thing you can do is just to take out the value of our publicly-listed companies: Gener, Electro and Tiete. You can see the market value is back there on Page 108, it\'s about $5.3 billion. If you take that out and you take out \'12 earnings, you pro rata it according to their debt.  I won\'t take you through all the math, but I get to about 9.5, so that says that if you take those businesses out there that are publicly-traded liquid vehicles, the P/ E on our remaining business, the PE is low to mid-9s, which I think folks would say that that\'s an attractive number.
Free cash flow yield. I think I took you through the $1 billion to $1.3 billion. Last year, it was $1 billion to $1.4 [ph] billion, but let\'s just use $1 billion to $1.3 billion as a general range, $10 billion as the denominator, that gets you to $10 billion to $13 billion. And once again, we\'ve talked about 4% to 6% EPS growth in the dividend yield, with the modest dividend but what we think is some attractive growth opportunities.
So with that, I\'m going to turn it back to Andres and then I\'ll come back with Andres and Andy for some Q&A at the end.
Andres Ricardo Gluski Weilert
Okay. What I\'d like to do in the wrap up is just go over some of the key points and also talk a little bit about our executive compensation. You\'ve met the team, you\'ve met Andy, Tom, Elizabeth and also Brian Miller, who\'s our Executive Vice President, is here. For legal affairs, he also handles government affairs or our compliance programs and a lot of our complex negotiations and arbitration.
So one of the things that I would like to point out is that our compensation, compared to our peers, is very highly, it\'s only about 19% of the Executive Vice President level, is base pay. This is higher than most of our peers. The other 80% is variable.
Now, if we look at the breakdown of that, about 22% is our annual bonus. And of our annual bonus, 60% of that is financial, and 20% is operational. That\'s using the Key Performance Indicators, KPIs, it\'s things like commercial availability, things like losses in the distribution company. 10% is safety, and we hold ourselves to very high standards. In terms of safety, we really have not been achieving 100% on that because we do have fatalities. And 10% is strategic objective. So that 22% is very much tied to the performance of that year.
Then we have performance in stock units, which is almost 30%. Now, that has a double hurdle for all the officers in the company. So, first, we had a cash value added calculation, which is EBITDA minus our maintenance CapEx and environmental CapEx. And the reasoning behind that sort of number, that cash value added, it\'s like economic value added, is -- are you -- how much cash are you generating from the business on a sustainable basis?
Now, not only do we have to meet a 3-year target, so, say, this is a year 2012, that target will be set for \'13, \'14 and \'15 based on the commodity prices and FX at that time. But not only do we have to do that, but we also have a second hurdle and that second hurdle has to do with our total shareholder TSR return versus a group of peers, in this case, it\'s the S&P Utilities. So we have to have a full payout, we have to be above the median for the S&P Utilities over that 3-year period. So it\'s 3 months at the beginning and the 3 months at the end. And this has been pretty tough. I can tell you that I\'ve lost about half of my possible payouts over the last 3 years as a result of having met this target.
Then 18% is stock options and 12% is restricted stock units, which vests over 3 years. Now the other thing I\'d like to point out is that if you look at our compensation scheme, ISS is quite tough on corporations. We scored the highest possible, so 1 is the best possible score, 2 is less good. We scored 1s on paper performance and we scored a 1 on transparency of executive pay. The other thing I talked about the cost cutting measures that we\'ve taken to place, we\'ve already -- our goal is to cut almost 40% of our overhead -- corporate overhead. At the same time, we\'ve eliminated, I think, virtually every single perk for the executives. So there\'s not only no corporate debt, which as we were but there\'s no car, there\'s no chauffeur, there\'s no golf club, I think our Blackberry probably is the highest sort of executive perk that we get.
Tom mentioned that we really have, as an internal goal to push our returns to the 8% to 10% level. And we do have leverage. I mean, we\'ve touched on some of them today, incremental cost reductions, not only at court but in the businesses. Continuing to leverage our scale in terms of global business procurement, in terms of how can we leverage that scale to get a better deal.
Platform expansions. You\'ve seen that virtually everything that we\'re doing now in terms of growth are platform expansions. The evidence is, it costs us much, much less to develop those, but it\'s also provides a much better risk-adjusted return because you know that market very well. And also, our capital allocation decisions.
Now getting to the capital allocation, what we\'ll be looking at is not only big deals, but a number of small additions to the facilities which have higher returns, lower risks and lower construction time. And Andy talked -- touched on a lot of that.
Of course, there are market factors, which can affect this positively. One is currency and commodity trends.  Annmarie Reynolds mentioned how we are -- we benefit from a weaker dollar versus most of these currencies. We also benefit from higher natural gas prices in the U.S. and higher oil prices globally. And higher demand growth in those key markets. Now, again, we are located in -- we have a very good footprint in markets, which have much plastered growth rates than the U.S.
So getting back to where we started. We\'ve been implementing this for 18 months, this new strategy, and this new approach to exploiting our platforms in our businesses and we\'re going to continue with that approach. And we think we\'re starting to see the results from that. So improving profitability, and again EPS -- adjusted EPS was up 22% last year.
Narrowing our geographic focus, continue -- we will continue to sell assets off. Those where we don\'t have a compelling competitive advantage and to give a little bit more sort of structure than what is the compelling competitive advantage. Well, we\'re either the low-cost provider, or we have a portfolio of assets where we have different fuels. Or we have really a better contracted position and a better relationship with clients, all those things come into things from which you can have a competitive advantage.
So in terms of narrowing our geographic focus, we\'ve exited 6 markets. We will exit more. We realized $1.1 billion in proceeds to AES, and we\'ve simplified, we think our -- we are going to continue to simplify. So hopefully, we\'re actually simplifying the business itself.  At the same time, we\'re providing more information in simplifying the AES story.
And finally, in terms of optimizing our capital allocation, we\'re going to continue to have great investment discipline through our investment committee process. We\'re really going to see where the best use of our cash between different strategic business units and in time as well. And the other thing that you will have noticed in these presentations is that in a lot of the locations, we\'re using cash that we have in those businesses and can\'t really cost-effectively get back to court. So for the example, the expansion in India at OPGC, from OPGC II, that business has on hand about $180 million. And so that will be most of the equity contribution to that project. So what we\'re doing is leveraging off those situations where we have cash to grow the business faster.
So in summing up. I would say that we feel that we still are a compelling investment. We have -- you\'re seeing the changes that are happening in the company. We\'re feeling a real momentum in the company. You\'ve met the key management team and our interests are certainly very aligned with yours.
So, thank you very much. And now, I\'d like to go to Q&A. So if Andy and Tom meet me on the podium.
Ahmed Pasha
[Operator Instructions]
Julien Dumoulin-Smith - UBS Investment Bank, Research Division
Julien Dumoulin-Smith from BBS. So Andres, congratulations, first 18 months through here. You talked a lot about and executed a lot of asset sale. Clearly, there\'s a pending spin of the certain Solar business. You\'ve talked about targeted asset sales for this year; it seems like this Solar business could achieve the bulk of that. But at the same time, you talked about having a dilutive impact potentially from some of these sales. Is there something beyond Solar that we should be expecting for this year? What\'s the game plan from here on out, \'13, \'14, in terms of a glide path to get this new profile that you talked about?
Andres Ricardo Gluski Weilert
Well, to use Tom\'s analogy about the kitchen, we don\'t talk about the souffl\xc3\xa9 until we\'re taking it to the table. What I would say is that if you look at the sort of $500 million number that we mentioned in the fourth quarter call, you will see that we closed the sale of Ukraine and that\'s over $100 -- $109 million net. We also had the closing of the final tranche of Cartagena in Spain, which is around $24 million. And then we also had a third sale, which was about another $40 million. So we\'re close to -- if you add it up, closer to the $200 million number. So if going beyond that, what I would say is that we\'re looking at exiting those businesses. Again, where -- they don\'t fit into having a critical mass and a real advantage in that market. So places where we have sort of one-off plants are obviously the targets or places where it\'s key that we don\'t have a platform that will allow us to grow from that. So I can\'t really talk much about the other issues that you mentioned, but we\'re committed to meet that target. But what I think is very important is that we\'re approaching a methodical way and making sure that, again, we realize as much value as we can from them. The first sale that we did included things like Atimus in Brazil, which was the telecom, which were highly accretive in China. As we go forward, we will be selling some where there are perhaps, let\'s say, more difficult locations where your multiples are lower. And there\'s always a gap between the sale and the use of that money, whether it\'d be to pay down debt or to reinvest at another business. So that\'s why Tom has laid out that we expect some dilution this year from continuing those asset sales. And we should be, majority done, with this program this year. Not to say that, in the future, we won\'t continue to sell those assets, which we feel, quite frankly, that have peaked and that it really don\'t form part of a platform that is necessary for us.
Ahmed Pasha
Ali?
Ali Agha - SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc., Research Division
Andres, a 2-part question. First off, at the very end, you alluded to your aspiration of, again, bringing the quarter return up to 8% to 10%. Can you give us a sense of, at this point, your confidence level in capturing that extra 200-basis-point of growth? And when at the earliest would we be able to hear from you? And when is this stuff out of the kitchen at the earliest that that is starting to bear fruit? Then I have a second question.
Andres Ricardo Gluski Weilert
Let\'s see, well, on the first, again, I think we will be -- we\'re providing a lot more information in terms of the things that we\'re doing. I think a lot of them, in terms of things that will get us up in terms of our total return, are -- have to be done at the operating units. Continued efficiencies, small add-ons, whether it\'d be an additional 25 megawatts from fogging technology or whether it\'d be using the detailed capacity that you have to sell potable water, et cetera, additional cost cut. Obviously, there is -- we do have some commodity and currency sensitivities, and those will also be a factor. So rather than, say, like one point in time, we\'ll continue to update you as we see. We\'ve had slight headwinds the first quarter due to the poor hydrological conditions in Brazil and also in Panama. So but we\'re -- have other things that have been offsetting that. So it\'s just that, as time progresses and we have more concrete developments, especially on the small projects, we will try to lump them together and give you some feeling of sort of the time line and the returns on those. And in terms of the sales as well, I mean, we cannot comment on any sale until it\'s signed and quite frankly, in the closing phase. For -- on multiple levels, but, first, it can affect the deal. And second, of course, we will have to operate the asset until the day we turn it over.
Ali Agha - SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc., Research Division
And if I go to a separate unrelated question. Tom, and both of you alluded to the fact that your evaluation in the market looks attractive, looks discounted. How concerned are you that, despite all these efforts that this conglomerate discount will continue to impact your valuation? And if that\'s the case, you come out of this program and the valuation still hasn\'t picked up, what are you prepared to do then, if anything, to try to bring that multiple up? I mean, how tied are you to these core markets? And what different approach would you be looking at if the market just doesn\'t give you the recognition?
Thomas M. O\'Flynn
Well, obviously, again, I think for the 18 months, if you look at our multiples, we\'ve had a good reaction to it. And I think this is a big company with a lot of assets. And so, it takes time to see the results of all the actions that you\'re taking. So I think we\'re starting to gather steam, and you\'re starting to see the results. Obviously, we are very much aligned in terms of maximizing the value of this business. So we will reassess. We\'re always reassessing the strategy and if we think it would need to be changed.
But I think, even if you look at corp, one of the challenges that we\'ve given ourselves in the corporate, in terms of our overhead, is let\'s make sure that we create more value than we cost as a company. And I think we\'re doing that. So if you look at the degree of the cuts that we\'ve done, if you look at the way we\'ve become so much more cost-efficient in our development, if you look at our capital allocation, again, using partners selectively to increase returns on those assets, I think we\'re making very good progress. So that\'s the challenge we have. We\'re very conscious of this, and quite frankly, down the road, nothing\'s off the table. We will do whatever it takes to maximize the return from these set of assets.
Unknown Analyst
If you could just articulate the dividend payout strategy, 30% to 40% by 2015, if you review it each December, it looks like you\'ll have 3 opportunities to increase it by yearend of \'15. I\'m just curious as to the trajectory of the dividend increases.
Andres Ricardo Gluski Weilert
Well, what we\'ll say is, as Tom played out, it\'s part of our budget cycle in the fourth quarter.  We will look at the setting the dividend levels for next year. So we\'ll reevaluate it at that point in time, having very good idea of the parent free cash flow that we have, the sustainable parent free cash flow. Because, again, we don\'t want this to vary greatly over time. So I think that as our parent free cash flow grows, the dividend will grow, and we will have -- we\'ll be within that band of 30% to 40%. We\'ve always said that we wanted to grow the dividends over time and we wanted to grow it in terms of asset proportion of the cash that we\'re utilizing. So we started from a modest base, we\'ve been delivering and we will prudently increase that over time, looking at how the new projects, how all these cost cutting measures, how our increase in efficiencies are delivering parent free cash flow.
Unknown Analyst
So just a follow-up question here. Maybe this time for Tom. You talked about potentially making an injection into AES Gener. Previously, we\'ve heard half -- more of the discussion around doing a public equity issuance locally. We also didn\'t hear as much as was about share repurchases versus past quarter updates. Curious how you\'re thinking of the ball there, if you don\'t mind.
Thomas M. O\'Flynn
Yes. Perhaps, I hit the Gener capital raise too quickly. I wasn\'t trying to change what we said before. If Gener does need equity and Felipe and his team are still thinking through that, it would be done in the local Chilean market. And the local participants, including pension funds, at least half of the public closed down there, we would expect who would want to participate in there. So the question for us is do we want to participate in our 71% of whatever that equity raise? We call that up to $200 million. I don\'t want to get -- to be specific, Gener has not made a decision to do it and probably, we haven\'t got the decision in front of us. I don\'t want [indiscernible] around the Chilean capital markets here.
But that\'s -- in the commercial standpoint, just to stop on that, if you think about -- so maybe at a growth opportunity, maybe a simple as would you -- is it better to invest in AES stock or is it better to invest in Gener stock. And that\'s something that we will and have already begun to think about it. Clearly, we think both are attractive values.
I think on the Gener side, look, Felipe showed a great record since \'05, up 462%. So you could probably say at any point in time we might have felt, boy, Gener has a lot better value than AES.  Why don\'t we sell down Gener at any time? Since \'05, it probably would have been a negative economic decision. So we have to appreciate that there\'s good growth and even though their multiples are better than us, we think they\'re still a very attractive play as we do think is AES. Nevertheless, we would make that debt effectively relative investment decision, I\'d say it doesn\'t need to be an all or nothing, it\'s not a barbells. You can put the and baby and do things in between. And certainly, we see a quite strong demand down there from the Chilean markets, in the event we wouldn\'t want to participate fully. The only thing I\'d say is that on the margin, there are some governance issues.  It\'s a very balanced market. We do have outsiders on our board. So it really needs to be done from an arm\'s length standpoint.  That being said, [indiscernible] as simple as from a government standpoint but to stay above 67%, which hits once we go below 230 [indiscernible] this government [indiscernible] the implication. So we\'ll see.
But when we do have, and maybe I didn\'t hit this enough, we do continue to have $300 million of stock repurchase authority.  We got that -- that was announced during our year-end calls, continue to be something we assess. I think we did say that -- I think went through a lot of share repurchases we\'ve done. 50 or 60 and 11\'s 55? I think we did say for this year, our initial priority for cash would be debt retirement. I mean, we feel like we done that with our tender repurchase that I\'ve touched on briefly. And we did also say that some of our cash coming up we felt was more voted -- weighted towards the latter part, but these are all [indiscernible] that we\'ll take into account as we carefully set the capital allocation.
Unknown Analyst
Perhaps just a quick follow-up, Tom. You talked about debt tenders and debt paid down here.  Given where interest rates are, currently, I imagine, where we -- what you just said there, you said, which we\'ve already seen some debt paid on announcement this year, we\'re done for the year and perhaps my question is, to what extent do we see some further refinancings, perhaps at subsidiaries, given how attractive net interest rates are today?
Thomas M. O\'Flynn
Yes. We think we\'re done our 400, 420.  Our tender to have a huge net capital, to be safe at around 300 cash, 275, 400, depending upon which maturity. So we think we\'re done. We think our continue to improve our credit level. We will continue to look for some subsidiary financings, the DPL process -- DPL, the P&L process is moving forward, it\'s being done well from maturity standpoint. The subsidiaries are now -- looks like the topped-up [ph] financing will be reasonable relative to expectations. And then, at the business, as we continue to look, so I mentioned that we file El Salvador.  We\'ve done other pieces like that. Nothing that\'s going to be a jump step in earnings, but there are attractive markets really around the world, as you folks know better than I and there are opportunities along of our businesses. I\'d rather not -- those examples, let\'s put it on a list. Once the team\'s working on it, rather than I make it [indiscernible] especially the extent that involves the outstanding bonds so I don\'t get in trouble.
Unknown Analyst
Given that you have predominantly a coal burning company, do you see more pressure from outside the U.S. somewhere else to put more environmental-related expenses and something that you have not planned or budgeted but it may come from somewhere else, pressure on you?
Thomas M. O\'Flynn
I\'d say from an environmental standpoint, Andres can add a comment.
Thomas M. O\'Flynn
From an environmental standpoint, we think we\'re in good shape. Ken\'s plans in Ohio are in good shape from the environmental standards. We\'re doing some work obviously at IPL that\'s the right thing to do and also has good rate base growth profile through it. There\'s something done at Chile, but I think after that, we\'re in good shape.
Andres Ricardo Gluski Weilert
I think that\'s a very good question. We\'re very conscious of having to have a diversity of fuels and a mix of fuels. So the way we think about our business is we will supply the fuel type that suits the needs of that country. So that country, for example, take Chile, says we want to incentivize renewables.  Then we, for example, we\'ll see what we can do to move in that direction. Or for example, in Chile, we did have to invest or investing about $200 million in environmental upgrades on our coal plants. So we see a real difference. I mean you have countries such as Vietnam, such as India, which really starved for energy, and the local fuel source that they have is lignite or coal, we don\'t see much pressure there. And quite frankly, again, given those shortages, they can\'t give themselves the luxury because, of course, with renewables, what is not talked a lot about is the spinning reserve that you have to have behind it. So during the World Cup, the wind stops blowing or a cloud comes over, and the country\'s blacked out, you can imagine what that would cause. So we\'re looking at in that point of view in terms of a balance. So you will see renewables, you will see coal projects where they make sense, you don\'t see any coal projects, for example, in the U.S. and you actually see retirements. So that\'s a balance in our portfolio. So I would say, as Tom mentioned, we\'re overall in pretty good shape. In the States, a lot of our fleet is scrubbed and we\'re putting in these additional investments for MATS now, so that\'s in the numbers that you\'re looking at, they\'re in the numbers for Chile, and that is -- and the countries where we don\'t, for example, something like Bulgaria, we are the state-of-the-art and the best, most leased -- say, the plant with the least emissions in country. So I think we\'re in pretty good shape, unless you had a real change in some of the countries like Philippines, Vietnam, or India and we don\'t see that in the future.
Unknown Analyst
Just a couple of questions. One maybe for Tom. Can you talk a little bit about longer term, if you\'ve gotten your balance sheet down to where I think you like it but if you talk about longer term, what type of parent leverage to some distributions you\'re targeting of? And then separately, on TPL, it looks like you\'re outlining some debt reduction there, can you talk about how you plan to reduce that debt from cash on hand, operating cash? And then more strategically longer-term on DPL, what do you think about as you move forward towards deregulating the generation business? How does that fit into the AES plan there? And sort of is it still core to your business owning unregulated generation? And what are potential hinderances to separate that out?
Thomas M. O\'Flynn
Okay. Let me talk about on the balance sheet, then I\'ll kick the strategy to my left to right. I think, let me say, from the AES perspective, I\'ll start there, we think as we brought the debt down, you saw one of my slides there, we brought it down about 5 to 7, as we sit here now. I think the debt is about -- is in reasonable shape, especially as we think about cash flow being able to grow. We think were getting to where we want to be in terms of solid BB. To the extent we may exterminate some additional assets will generally pay down more debt, generally, I think it said that the assets are sold. We use about half that money to pay down debt, so we\'re, generally, credit neutral. If their assets don\'t generate as much cash, pay down less to more cash rich, then we may pay down some more. But let\'s say 50-50 is a good walking around number. But so we think we made material progress and the improvement over the next couple of years will come more from cash improvement. With respect to DPL and DP&L, we are working with the banks at both the larger piece being a DPL to refinance and extend any maturities through 2016. That doesn\'t include the reduction of DPL, the parent. Was going to get DPL, we got DP&L, the regulated utility. But it does involve reduction this year of about $225 million. I think about $150 million immediately and then the rest over the year. That is with cash on hand. DPL ended the year with some cash that came from DP&L, and it was retained within DPL. I think we said we weren\'t going to do with dividend last year from DPL to AES.  It was retained just for this purpose, to be able to  put into this bank refi, bring down debt a little bit, and that basically kicks all the financing issues.  That will kick them to \'16, which is good. The one thing we do have, we have about 400 in change DP&L first mortgage bond maturity late-summer, early fall, that we think is quite reasonable for finance and we\'ll do that. And those folks would probably -- it would be easier to put that in once the other package is there. So I think with that said, we still think DPL has more debt than would be appropriate, especially given our goodwill work of last fall. So we will continue to bring that down, but it\'ll be step-by-step. There\'s some amortizations in that bank stuff of 40 to 50 years, something like that, which we think are quite reasonable, given the cash flow projection. In terms of separation, I think we\'ll be more specific. I think Ken talked about it in a later piece of the rate filing after the ESP gets nailed down. Generally, we look to give ourselves time to -- until 2017, that will be separating of the DP&L genco into a sister, effectively the DP&L disco. And that will be done, I think, consistent with other folks, maybe some of the PJM companies who have broken DND from gen into sisters. And we\'ll have to do that in context of overall optimization of the debt at DP&L and then DPL. We got some thoughts and we think that what we\'re doing now facilitates those thoughts, but we\'ll have to do some more work on that. Strategically, I think I\'ll let Andy or Andres talk as we think about the -- running a large competitive fleet, we\'ll think about that.
Andrew Martin Vesley
Okay. This was going a little bit more difficult to give a lot of insight to because, while we\'re in the middle of the case, it doesn\'t actually behoove us to talk about what\'s going to come after. In fact, until we see the outcome, it\'s very difficult to talk about strategy. Well, let\'s talk about a few things. One is, the idea of the separation of generation at DPL was not initiated by us. This was an issue that came up from the interveners during the settlement discussion. And to accommodate the movement of settlement, we had committed to look at this issue of separation. And that\'s what you see or saw on the slide that Ken put forward. We\'re already functionally separated and we\'re relatively comfortable from an operational perspective at DP&L that we didn\'t believe that separation of generation had to be an inherent part of the ESP filing. The concerns from the interveners were that there were too many opportunities for cross-optimization or unfair competition, things of that nature, mostly by the other large utilities or intervenors. But I think the issue for this is a couple of things. One is that clearly, when we get through that case, coming to some view on generation will become important. All right? We formed the SBU in the U.S. and I made this big talk about synergies. We believe there are significant synergies from operations and strategies that look at our generation fleet as 1 entity, not as separate business entities. We think there are opportunities to continue to improve performance. We think there are ownership and structural issues with the DP&L fleet bay that could be addressed. But it\'s going to be very important for us to understand what the -- sort of the value proposition once we come out of the case. And there a number of issues that we\'re waiting for there before we actually kick some other movements within the U.S. SBU and that\'s going to be something that Ken is going to be thinking about. But when we -- long-term, we see the U.S. as being 2 regulated businesses, IPL as an integrated utility, which we\'ve looked very hard at this to make sure that we\'re not being blindsided, as if Indiana can go the way of Ohio and Illinois. And we\'ll be happy to talk about that in lunch. Ken could talk at length about why we think Indiana will continue the way it is. I think we don\'t have to regulate network business in Dayton, and then we see the U.S. having a competitive supply business, which will have a retail component, really aimed at the efficient [indiscernible], the efficient way of bringing generation to market. But because we have a lot of stakeholders, and a lot of people who have different views on this, until we get through the case, it\'s very important that we know we have to think about these issues, but we really aren\'t talking about them at large. And one of the reasons being is it\'s very important for us to see what we come out with at the other side. So I think, as Ken said, we expect the rate decision the latter half of July. And after we see that, we\'ll start to deal some of these structural issues and we\'ll be happy to talk about our plans in more detail once we\'re past the rate case. So, I thought that wasn\'t terribly satisfying, but it\'s the best we can do at this time.
Ahmed Pasha
Okay. Ali, one last question. [indiscernible]
Ali Agha - SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc., Research Division
One last question. Near-term, Andres, in your presentation, there were 2 or 3 areas of concerns that were raised, Brazil, the regulatory and political involvement, Bulgaria, with all the uncertainly there and then I think Argentina, with the change in pricing and so on. Can you just, from your vantage point, tell us how you rank them in areas of concern for you as you\'re thinking about what could go wrong here? And how you get comfortable on this?
Andres Ricardo Gluski Weilert
What I\'ll say, as Andy pointed out, we\'re very actively involved in mitigating these risks. I think when you talk about Brazil, for example, you have to step back and take a little bit of a longer view. I mean, there\'s -- our, let\'s say, history in Brazil over the last 7 years, is actually been quite positive. And those figures that you were seeing did not include, for example, the sale of Atimus, where we had a business that -- we have $50 million invested. 5 years later, we sold it for $1 billion. Of course, we weren\'t the sole owners of that business, and have to share that up. That wasn\'t included in those numbers. So there\'s really the cases, but it doesn\'t mention of Eletropaulo, which was -- received a very severe regulatory tariff reset. And then there\'s the story of Sul, which is a story of operational improvements, and a reasonable regulatory outcome. And then you have Tiete. So overall, in Brazil, I think you have to look at it in that light. Now you will -- in the case of Brazil, if you look at value, and that\'s really how I look in terms of what\'s worries me more or less, is how much is at stake in that business.  It\'s really in between Sul and Tiete. So Brazil will continue to grow. Brazil will continue to need energy. And some of the, say, regulatory decisions that they may actually make some of the existing assets over time more attractive or the expansion because I think less things will get built in the short run. If you mentioned something like Argentina, I\'m sure that none of you are giving us a tremendous amount of value for Argentina. These are -- but we have some 3,000 megawatts of fantastic assets in Argentina, which had made money every year in the generation side. We made money in 2002. So these are world-class assets, and I think that we\'re very engaged in stakeholder management in Argentina. This new Regulation 95 came out. But if you think about somewhat longer term, these are very well-positioned assets which have a lot of upside if the situation improves in Argentina. But have also showed themselves to be tremendously robust. It\'s very different to be in the distribution business in Argentina than in the generation business, and we sold out of our distribution business. If you talk about Bulgaria, as Andy mentioned, it\'s a very -- it\'s the most modern plant in Bulgaria. It\'s the only plant which really meets all the EU regulations for 2016. It was a project which was very much sponsored and supported by the EBRD. And technically, we\'ve been very successful on that project. So not to say that we\'re not on top of them, we\'re not concerned about all of them, but I think that if you have to take somewhat of a longer view of this, and that\'s how we manage them quite frankly.
Ahmed Pasha
Okay. With that, we conclude today\'s presentation. Thank you for coming.
Thomas M. O\'Flynn
Thank you. Bye-bye.
Andres Ricardo Gluski Weilert
Thank you very much.
Ahmed Pasha
We can have lunch and other members of management are available to answer any remaining questions you may have.
Copyright policy: 
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY\'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY\'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY\'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.
If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: 
